review from https://www.amazon.co.uk/Perfecting-Exfoliant-Breakouts-Blackheads-Enlarged/product-reviews/B07C5SS6YD/ref=cm_cr_dp_d_show_all_btm?ie=UTF8&reviewerType=all_reviews,,,,,,,,,,,,,
,,,,,,,,,,,,,
name__-,rating__-,review_text__001,review_text__002,review_text__003,review_text__004,review_text__005,review_text__006,review_text__007,review_text__008,review_text__009,review_text__010,review_text__011,review_text__012
Jvabrown,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product arrived on the 21st Feb and today, ten days later, this is what my skin looks like. I have recently come off of my acne antibiotics and my skin instantly flared up again with sore white heads, papules and redness. Since adding this BHA into my skincare routine, this is the only change I have made, my skin's redness has significantly reduced, the texture is so soft (even my fiance has commented) and the spots have gone down a lot with no new ones! I'm not sure if it helps with scarring but we'll see... For now, I am a happy customer and will definitely be buying the full size bottle when my mini runs out 👌🏽\n",,,,,,,,,,,
torney134,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Have struggled with open pores and bumpy uneven skin for years, and more recently have had some problems with hormonal acne. This is a life-changer. My skin is smoother, it looks dewy and healthy for the first time ever and I haven't had any new spots in weeks! Be prepared for a little bit of purging and dryness initially - I had some new spots and flakiness in the first three days but it cleared up so quickly.","Note, it says put it on a cotton pad but I just put it on with my hands as so much is wasted in the cotton pads and it's too expensive for that!!\n",,,,,,,,,,
Megannn,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I bought this because The Ordinary are reformulating my go-to salicylic acid serum which means it’s out of stock everywhere.,This does basically the exact same thing as TO’s offering obviously - unclogging pores and keeping my problem skin under control. 2% is the highest strength you’re going to find so both are great options. In terms of performance they’re indistinguishable.,"I think I actually like this one better as a formula - it feels slightly moisturising in a way that TO’s doesn’t, which is reassuring when I don’t want my skin to dry out too much over night. The application / bottle design is so silly though - you’re going to waste so much product if you put it on a cotton pad so the directions feel like a con to make you use more than you need. I just drip it into clean palms and apply but as it’s very liquid that can get a bit messy and it just has a weird hole opening at the top. Paula’s Choice probably need to steal TO’s idea and get themselves some dropper bottles. It’s also plastic packaging compared to the glass of TO which can be recycled indefinitely where plastic can’t - not great from a sustainability point of view, P’sC!","All in all, very good and I prefer the formula slightly over other HG salicylics, but as it’s more expensive than other high-performing salicylic serums and comes in an annoying bottle that’s also plastic I’m not a convert. I will probably go back to The Ordinary once theirs is back in stock.\n",,,,,,,,
Nadine,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I never really write reviews but honestly this stuff works!! I have used a few drops on a cotton pad twice a day and within a couple of days my skin is already so much better. The small bumps under my skin that have been there for about 18 months have gone and my skin feels really smooth. Honestly so worth the money and thank you to whoever Paula is!!!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sabina,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Lovely product for congested skin, doesn't feel like it dries up your skin, it is quite a bit moisturizing even if you do not follow up with an actual moisturizer. As you can see in the photo when I received the product I had quite a lot of active pimples and my skin was feeling terrible and congested, the second picture is after around 2 weeks of using the product and I have got no active pimples just acne scars that are fading.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
 invisible,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  In short, this lives up to the hype. It has a noticeable effect immediately - after one use, at night, my skin felt really smooth and looked better, almost like a blurring of the pores and skin texture but most impressively, I had absolutely no oily patches. I have a very oily T-zone and all my life I’ve woken with up each morning aware of this horrible greasy skin in the middle of my face: it’s completely gone! Even if I felt no other effects, it’s worth it for that. I have now bought the full-size bottle. I’ve tried similar products and I don’t know what the difference is but for me at least, this is revolutionary stuff. Very pleased 😊\n",,,,,,,,,,,
elch,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I am a rosacea  sufferer so have to be careful what I use on my skin, but this has improved my skin texture. it removes all the grime from the day and makes the skin feel fantastic but it is very gentle.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jenny S,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I was running out of my chosen exfoliator and decided to try this one.,Skin type: Northern Caucasian/Nordic gently combination skin,"Sensitivity: Yes, I'm sensitive to small changes in humidity and temperature but it's generally not my skin that shows it","Result: Sadly the Skin Perfecting 2% BHA gives me an oily finish and doesn't fully absorb despite cleansing and toning as per instructed. The main difference between this one and my other leave-on exfoliators is that this is only BHA, not just AHA or AHA and BHA. This may be the reason or the exact formula used in this product doesn't agree fully with me. I didn't have an averse reaction but neither did it have fantastic enough results on me to make up for staining my pillow every night.",Verdict: Not a bad product and I wish others luck with it even if it didn't work for me.\n,,,,,,,
P.B,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Added this to my skincare routine and it's made a world of difference. I noticed that even after cleansing, I still had some build-up in my pores. Using this BHA has made a world of difference and the pores around my cheek/nose area look less obvious. It also seems to help with reducing and healing the few spots I get due to PMS.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
MrsS,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I ordered this after seeing it recommended on ITV's This Morning program by my favourite skincare guru, Caroline Hirons. Following her advice over the past few years has genuinely transformed my skin for the better and this product is another fantastic addition to my skincare routine! During the tv segment she suggested using it as a spot treatment to unclog the area or using it all over for oily and combination skins.","It's an excellent BHA liquid exfoliant, probably one of the best formulations of salicylic acid on the market right now. I mostly use it on my hormonal flare ups and it works like magic to calm down the redness and inflammation. There is no sticky finish and it layers well under serums and moisturiser. It's also brilliant on nose blackheads as well and if my skin is more congested than usual I use it all over the face without any problems.","Simply AMAZING!! After trying out a million different spot treatment products and wasting money on them I am happy to have finally found my holy grail item that actually works on stubborn spots! Give it a shot, you won't regret it.\n",,,,,,,,,
MsNorthman,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Absolute game changer for those of us with enlarged pores prone to filaments. This stuff works! (I have Combo skin with a very oily nose. Prone to excessive filaments rather than blackheads / spots etc.),I also love the fact that it has a 'cap' that you have to close prior to screwing on the lid to prevent accidental product wastage. Brilliant design.,"My only 'irk' is the cost. It is fairly expensive for the amount you get, and I was shocked at the tiny bottle - even though I knew I had only purchased 30ml, so shouldn't have been.","I would suggest buying the 30ml first, to see if your skin likes the product. It would appear that your skin either 'loves' it or is just a bit 'meh'. At which point you really don't want to have shelled out £30 for a product that doesn't appear to be helping you.\n",,,,,,,,
Laura DC,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  UPDATED 2 days later,I cannot believe how good this product is. I'm amazed! My pores have shrunk since second use!!! I can actually see a difference in the amount of sebo on my skin. It's definitely worth the money! Can't wait to see results in two weeks time!!!,ORIGINAL,I honestly thought it was a big bottle so I got very disappointed when I saw this tiny thing in the box. Stupidly I should have read the capacity I know but it looked so big in the picture! Besides that I just tried and can't wait to see results in few weeks. I'll try to use it twice a day as it recommends. I have to agree with other reviews about the way the product comes out of the bottle.. not the best as it seems a lot of waste. You need to be very careful. It's pricey but hopefully will do the job ! I use it in combination with a blackhead suction tool. Will update this review in a couple of weeks.\n,,,,,,,,
Emily martin,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This is rather expensive for a small bottle, however that being said i have tried so many different products and facewashes, creams, serums ect, i have only used this once before bed and already i have noticed a difference i have suffered with acne since having my son which i never used to and it got me so down, i have even tried prescription products which also didnt work well for me, i cant wait to see the end result, even my blackheads/whiteheads around my nose and reduced drastically, next time ill be buying the bigger bottle once my small bottle runs out!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
sana,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I bought the smaller version some time back I was happy to see nice improvements so ordered bigger bottle. Hope it keeps me happy. I have combination skin as guidelines says there are other exfoliator (aha) for other types of skin. Am on journey to improve my skin with best products wich wont hunt my wallet too. Thisnis how am proceeding 1- Cleanse (murad vit C) 2-tone (ordinary or pixi) 3-Paula choice 4-serum/oil (your choice) 5- moisturiser (embrolysis) sleep ❤\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Andrea Harris-Evans,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I used this product yesterday before I went to sleep. I woke up and my big spots and pimples which I’ve been trying to get rid of for weeks have gone! This is after ONE application.,Product leaves a tingling sensation which i personally like as I know it’s working. The tingling is not painful at all.,I’ve still got textured skin after ONE application but my big spots have gone which has built up my confidence a lot.,However I bought the smallest sized one as it was the cheapest and I didn’t know if I was going to like the product. Safe to say It’s extremely small but a great way and price to try the product for the first time. If you are thinking of buying the product get the bigger one.,Love this product.\n,,,,,,,
A,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product did not impact my skin at all. I used it twice a day and followed the instructions by following with a sunscreen. I feel like my skin got a bit worse. It made me go red and left some parts of my face (forehead, upper cheeks and chin) very oily. I'm still using the product and it has been two/three weeks (just to see if I'm being impatient with the results) but still have not seen any improvements. I have almost finished this 30ml bottle and don't think I will be purchasing it again.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I bought 1 sample size to test it out on my skin then bought another , just to make sure it’s really not just a temporary solution. But I’m 4 months in and love . My skin is glowing and pores are decreasing. I would strongly advise getting a tester first and going from there. This tester is real . But please get the full size bottle from a trustable store . Not all Amazon sellers sell the real thing .\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Kate E,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Been trying many different salicylic acids since The Ordinary has been out of stock and finally come to this one.,"Amazing, works way better for me than The Ordinary and I will be sticking with it. I have struggled with my skin for years and now it is the clearest it has ever been.","I don't use a cotton pad, just put 3-4 drops in my palms and put straight on my face.\n",,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Amazing product! I’ve suffered from white heads on my cheeks for around 4 years now. I have tried many textured exfoliators such as sugar scrubs but they were always too abrasive and didn’t really do anything.,I started using this exfoliator every night in my skin care routine and it’s cleared my skin up! I’m so happy! It also makes your skin feel so smooth. It’s really helped my make up sit nicely when I wear it.,I would recommend buying the smaller bottle if it’s your first time because it is quite pricey. I’ll be buying the larger bottle next time :),Only downfall is that I wish the bottle was a pipette because I usually pore it into my hands and tap it into my skin. I don’t like using a cotton pad as it eats most of your product so it’s quite wasteful.\n,,,,,,,,
Lauren,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have dry flaky skin and speaking from my own personal experience I can say that I love this product! As someone who can't stand physical exfoliants, chemical exfoliants are always my go to, this particular product has helped remove unwanted bumps and texture from my skin and has also helped in making my skin look and feel healthy! I personally don't use a cotton round to apply as I feel as if it absorbs the product (and it is quite pricey) so I just use my hands but ensure I have cleaned them thoroughly beforehand, for me I didn't feel any irritation when applying but I am accustomed to salicylic acid products, if you have never used products that contain salicylic acid, I would recommend not to start off with daily use as this can be too much for your skin to handle! It's best to introduce it slowly, start off with around 2-3 times a week and gradually build up! Even though I am accustomed to salicylic acid I still find that twice a day is still a bit too intense so I just stick with once every day! Obviously everyone has different skin but despite that I would always recommend you build up to this product first as to avoid any potential irritation!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
enny,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Wow!!!!!! Speechless.. You have to try it yourself. In a week, i could go without foundation. I cant believe it. Finally, a skincare product that actually performs magic!!","My dark skin has never been this good. I suffered from large pores, uneven skin tone, rough skin and after trying a lot of products. I had accepted my faith and gave up.",I do not have sensitive skin so i replaced my toner with this. U need to know how to fit it into ur skincare routine. It is not drying or harsh as I expected. And it gave me a gloss. Finally!! My pearl face..\n,,,,,,,,,
Jessica,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I bought this in the hopes it would help with the texture of my skin as I get lots of little bumps on my cheeks and forehead.,Less than 2 weeks of using it once daily and all of the little bumps are gone and previous acne scars are greatly reduced.,I am in love!,I will definitely be purchasing once I run out.\n,,,,,,,,
Sandra,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have been using this product for just over a month and I can say that this is one of the best facial products I have ever used. I have been struggling with acne for over 10 years - before I started using this product, I had regular breakouts, lots of hyper-pigmention and dehydration. My skin now looks better than ever - only an occasional spot, and even, smooth skin. I highly recommend this product! It's a life-saver.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jordan,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I’ve really struggled with my skin but I think I’ve found the answer, at first I just used this product every other night after I cleansed and I saw a slight improvement, I’ve done moved onto using it every night after cleansing and my skin looks amazing! I’ve only been using it a month but I feel like I will have flawless skin. I haven’t found my skin has dried out at all but I’ve still been using my day time routine, I personally use bare minerals for my daytime routine I was abit worried about mixing two brands together because of different chemicals but these together have worked wonders for me.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
james89,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I had beautifully smooth kid right up till about four years ago when BAM all of a sudden I was afflicted with hormonal acne and suffered with it terribly for four years. It affected my self confidence and self esteem.to the point of madness and not wanting to leave the house and I've tried everything... Laser, over the counter stuff, even pill but this single handedly has cleared my acne overnight. I feel like I have new skin. It is a little bit drying and leaves me a bit flakey but hey, I'd take today any day over the hideous acne I had!!!!!! Just use lots of moisturiser and use a small amount only... SENSATIONAL product. For me anyway.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Smurf XX,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This was suggested to me on a skin care forum as I have oily skin and enlarged pores. I decided to buy the miniature as I didn't want to commit to the expense of a full size product if it didn't suit me. I have to say I am really pleased with it, my pores do appear to have shrunk and my skin is feeling less oily during the day. I have just purchased more of their products from the actual Paula's Choice website now as this seems to be out of stock everywhere else... which should also be an indication as to how good it is.",Only warning is that it can dry out your skin so if you do decide to go for this product please make sure you have a decent moisturiser to apply around 15minutes after.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Anna,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Didn’t see that much difference. And definitely my mistake expecting bigger bottle for this price, but for me it either just didn’t agree but I saw no significant changes after finishing this tiny bottle using it twice a day. Skin felt quite nice and smoother, I’ll give it that. But the impurities on the skin dimished as they normally would overtime anyway, maybe with a little help but I expected more from this expensive product.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Elizabeth McKay,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is a game changer. I have keratosis pilaris (otherwise know as chicken skin) on my arms and have always been told to exfoliate to help it but found physical exfoliation just aggravates my skin. This product is amazing, after just one use my skin was visibly smoother and less red/ angry looking. I also use this on my face and have found that it has helped reduce the appearance of black heads significantly. My skin feels so smooth after using this product.","If you have dry skin this might not be the product for you, it might be worth looking into the lotion version as BHA does dry out your skin quite a bit. I’ve just been using my moisturiser afterwards as normal and found that works for me though.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I think this works for me. I had a really bad outbreak on my chin and i purchased this product because it had great reviews so i gave it a try. A couple of days after using it, the spots got a lot better, almost disappeared. I also have sensitive skin but I don't find this product irritating...\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Queensheba,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Excellent but pricy for the size. I got the largest size . I think they can rethink the price point . It is however a good product , it keeps pimples at bay , clears blackheads , my skin is very smooth too. Only downside is with regular use it lightens the skin . Now I am a beautiful chocolate queen and not keen at all on the lightening which also is strips the skin of its natural protection against uv rays . I use this sparingly mainly at night and certainly not everyday.  I have a regular toner for daily use.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Ellesse Logan,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I first heard about the product from a Skin Care YouTuber (Hyram). It is one of his favourite products and recommends it in almost every video he posts. Therefore, I decided to give the product a try, slightly skeptical as I have trusted recommendations before, but they have not lived up to the hype. HOWEVER, this product did everything he said it would! I have enlarged pores, which are the bane of my life as I feel I must wear make-up to cover them. But this product saved my life! While it does not make my pores invisible it does make them look smaller, so they are less noticeable meaning I can have make-up free days without feeling like a gross gremlin.",I would 100% recommend this product and also recommend checking out Hyram's YouTube channel or Instagram (skin care by Hyram); he's amazing and full of knowledge\n,,,,,,,,,,
Zoe,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  The little bottle is so cute and when you twist the lid off there is another level of safety with a plastic flap to prevent any liquid from spilling. Unfortunately this was not kind to my skin which is very disappointing as I was hoping to find the holy grail. It caused a horrible breakout within a couple days of using and I now have additional acne scars which I was trying to prevent. Won’t be using the rest.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Claire,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I ruined my skin by over using skin care products and over exfoliating which led to a damaged top layer than I’ve been trying to cure ever since. This led to over moisturising to combat the dryness and damage which caused clogged, enlarged pores across my nose and cheeks and redness which I thought was rosacea. I’m wary of putting anything on my face these days other than a basic moisturiser as my skin is now so sensitive and inflamed but I read reviews saying this helped to shrink pores so I started using this every other day and then every day over the past week. My pores have noticeably shrank, look clearer and the redness, that I thought was rosacea but believe was just inflammation from the clogged pores, has all but gone! My skin feels moisturised and plumped and I experienced no irritation at all. This has really been a miracle product for my specific issues!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Georgia M.,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  It's hard to review a skincare product after only using it a couple of weeks, but there was a day I used it and it burned my face and made it itchy. This is not the fault of the product, but be careful with it especially if you have recently shaved/removed hair from your face. I recommend waiting a week before using it if your skin can get sensitive sometimes due to over exfoliation, hair removal and seasonal allergies.",It is a good product but I personally do not use it daily. I use it a couple of times a week. This is a chemical exfoliate and not a toner. My skin cleared up and now feels very smooth - but this is down to a combination of products and vigorous oil cleansing and being careful about what actives I use on what day. I do recommend this product but not for daily use.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Brenda P,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I am amazed at the results. I’ve been using this product for enlarged pores on my nose. I had hoped for a little shrinkage but they have practically disappeared. I’m 68 Have been using this for two weeks but it showed results after the first application. A couple of drops applied with clean fingers is all that’s needed. I wish I’d found this years ago.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Dorothy Barraclough,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have not used the product personally; it was bought for my daughter.  She found the product too drying to be able to continue using it to help clear acne.  She has dry sensitive skin.  Maybe the product works for people with less sensitive skin.  I think it's just a question of trial and error to find what suits you.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
zahra,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  So i have combination skin and honestly i have no breakouts because of this, my pores are tight and everytime i have a spit i can literally get rid of it within days just because BHA penetrates deep within the skin and removes all dirt from the inside. This is a life saver because i can literally get rid of a spot days before a party/wedding\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Anna Whitehead,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I’ve been using this for about a month (I have combination skin with an oily t-zone with enlarged pores and blackheads, my cheeks don’t really have any problems at all and I have hormonal acne) and it has really helped to reduce the amount of spots I get, although they do still appear. At first I used it every day, however this dried my skin out, so I would recommend only using two or three times a week at first and gradually building up to every day if necessary. This product is pricey but it does work, smoothing out skin texture, reducing blackheads and helping acne as long as it’s used correctly. I don’t use a cotton pad to apply either like they recommend as I found it just soaked up and wasted a lot of product, so I just apply it with clean fingers.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Tasha,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This is a really good product I’d reccomend it more than a scrub, definitely use with a good moisturiser, I have oily skin and this has left me with my skin dried and peeling, I don’t mean that in a bad way the product is doing it’s job just use with a good moisturiser and build up using the product gradually!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jennifer reilly,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I purchased the small bottle as wanted to give this a go and see what the hype was about, and I was not disappointed, I wish I'd discovered this before, it's absolutely amazing, I've only been using this for a few days and I can already see the difference in my skin.","I've always suffered with huge congested pores and blemished oily skin, and I can already see that my skin appears clearer and my pores look minimised. My make up looks flawless now with barely any pores visible in my once golf ball like skin, and oil is minimal.","Needless to say this is my new holy grail and I will be purchasing full size product, absolutely worth the extra money and so glad I discovered this.\n",,,,,,,,,
Ellyssa Faye Gallito,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Very happy with this product. I have hormonal and stress induced acne and it helps me clean the impurities in mu skin. After a few use, I do see the blackheads/whiteheads that use to be seated deep in my skin which causes my cystic acnes. I do hope that after the purging, I would have a clearer, breakout free skin. I have high hopes for this brand; will review again after 3 months of using this product.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Elizabeth Cornick,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’ve been using this product for the last few weeks. I did start using one or twice a day but my skin started flaking so now only using once every other day. I’m still getting cystic acne in my chin area but other part of my face have seemed to improved. Going to keep going and hope it gets better.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Claire Marshall,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was sceptical about the hype on this product, but I have to admit it was all true. This stuff is amazing! I use it in the morning and just let it do its work throughout the day, under my makeup. Its cleared clogged pores, gently dried up long standing blemishes and given me much clearer brighter skin!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jason Sobey,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Absolute skin care staple, I can honestly","Not complement this enough. I have sensitive skin, this does not irritate and It does not dry. But I wake up in the morning and my skin feels like never before. I recommend this to anyone who asks and will continue to do so. Outdoes even its equivalents in the the world of Korean skin care which is a very rare accolade indeed.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Asher,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This is great, I put on between washing face and moisturising. It's perfect in liquid form as it dries in 10-15 seconds and i saw results very quickly (used on nose in the AM of Day one and noticed much clearer pores by day 2 PM. It has no applicators so you either drop onto cotton or fingertips and apply\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Paul,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I was a little worried at first about using this on a daily basis. I have quite bad Rosacea on my nose and cheeks and chemical peels are sometimes a little harsh. I have been using this twice a day for three weeks now and my skin looks plump and clean. The redness has even reduced quite a lot. I will certainly be sticking with this and the toner of the same brand.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I am so happy I found this product. It has single handedly got rid of my acne. I use this after cleaning and toning. After just a few days of using all of my spots dissppeared I still have acne scarring but I don’t really get any new spots anymore. When I do it’s gone by the next day. I use once or twice a day .  Amazing product!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mags,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  My skin is combination and I've been having a few issues with under skin acne and nothing will move it, but after using this lotion twice I have already seen a difference to my skin. It's expensive for the size of the bottle but worth it for the results. I'll be buying larger bottle I think.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Shopaholicstudent ,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Would repurchase over and over. Takes a few weeks for skin to get used to this product (purging) but afterwards, it really helps to smooth skin and gets rid of any bumpiness. It’s part of my daily routine (I have oily skin) and my skin starts to break out if I forget to use it. Even large spots that are surfacing completely disappear with this product, so the spot never forms. Fabulous.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Makedah Simpson,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Hearing about the rave reviews, I was skeptical but on purchasing the travel size, I was able to understand the exfoliator does work for my skin. Over a couple of weeks, it has improved my texture and faded some of my discolouration in places to even out my skin tone. As a Black woman, it can be difficult to find products that work as well to solve specific problems but I will be incorporating this into my routine by purchasing the full sized version when I can.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
thanhmy,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Nice little lotion for maintaining a moderate spot free face. Absorbs quickly and you don’t need much.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Eva O,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I literally never write reviews but honestly this product is amazing . I often have little faith with  face products Wondering if they actually do anything but I had noticeable changes of this after 3 days. I bought it because I was having lots of sub clinical acne on my foreheads and a google website recommended this , and Literally 80% cleared within 5 days. At the start it would sting my face a little , it has stopped doing that now but I also feel it Isn’t doing that much any more. It is definitely expensive though\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Dannyell,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I tried this product after seeking advice from others who suffer from adult acne/ oily skin, like myself.","Has smoothed the texture of my skin so that makeup can be applied more evenly, thus disguising any suggestion of breakouts. My open pores have shrunk especially around my nose area where I often get blackheads, and skin looks more 'dewy' instead of oily.","It's a bit pricey for daily use and I find using the cotton pad it doesn't go very far, but overjoyed with the results.\n",,,,,,,,,
Melissa,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I bought this as I suffer with bumps under my skin, particularly on my forehead. While I can’t say it’s completely cured the problem, it’s definitely improved the texture of my skin and I do notice a smoother appearance to my skin when I use it. I am on my third bottle and will continue to purchase if I see continued improvement. Definitely worth a try!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Natalia Bandalewicz,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  High price but every product from this brand is worth every penny. I’d say its the best one in the world.,"This exfoliant is really great, it does help with enlarged pores full of sebaceous filaments. Would only recommend for oily combination or normal skin type.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Laura ,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Love love love this. After using only for 2 weeks I have had comments about how clear my skin is. I suffer with large pores and blackheads and spots under my skin but using this twice a day after cleansing has started to clear my skin and give me a glow.,I only bought the 30ml bottle and I think it is a little expensive as I ran out in two weeks but I have ordered another and maybe will use more sparingly now my skin is cleaning up! But definitely will continue to use!!!\n,,,,,,,,,,
Samantha,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Had high Hope's for this product but was one of the worst things I have ever put on my face. Even with only using once per week I was breaking out on my chin with clusters of deep cystic spots. Some did come up to massive heads but it looked so bad I didnt want to leave the house. They also scared and left red marks even though I didnt poke at them. If I had of bought direct from Paula's choice I would have sent it back for a refund. I tried for a month but it didnt get any better. Waste of £30\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Has really cleared up my skin, I no longer have those tiny little bumps across my forehead, really pleased!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Rose Johnson,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is always held up as a holy grail and recommended by everyone but for me it has made no noticeable effect on my skin, and is expensive considering the limited effect it has had. But other people have loved it, so maybe it’s just not for my skin! (I have oily combination skin)\n",,,,,,,,,,,
margot,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product seems to be working. Milia are much less obvious and am hopeful they will go\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Honestly best product I've bought! I had loads of small bumps all over my forehead for years and didn't realize it was a form of acne, I've been using this as part of my normal skin care routine and its amazing my forehead is now super smooth! I have very sensitive skin so was very cautious at first, i used it once every other day after my toner and now i use it twice a day! Would highly recommend !!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jane B.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It’s early days but already I can see improvements to my skin. Recommend\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Abby,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Tiniest bottle ever! expected it to be a lot bigger for £15 didn’t last a week used it twice a day and noticed no improvement, I think since using it I’ve got more pimples. Won’t be purchasing again. My skin type is normal to dry skin.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Amazing product , used it once over a period of 2 days and I can already notice the difference - it reduced the appearance of spots on my cheeks and soothed the red hyperpigmentation . I’ve struggled with hyperpigmentation for years and tried different products and even had cosmetic facials and nothing has gotten close to helping it apart from this . I brought the 30ml but will be investing in the full size !\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jasmine hughes,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Don’t feel like this did anything, small bottle doesn’t look as big as it seems. Like a water consistency but I don’t think it made a massive difference and I used it everyday\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Sukhi Patwal,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I dont know where to start with this bad boy this is like some magic potion your face was waiting for it to be sprinkled on. It honestly took me for a surprise! Instant results, reduces the appearance of pores, evens out skin tone and makes your skin look fresh and healthy.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’ve only had this product 2 days and I’m already seeing results!! Burns a bit when you put it on so you know it’s working. My skin is already clearing up and looking less oily.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
sid,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent. Was really struggling with spots despite retinol. But after I started double cleansing with a balm and using this my spots have improved significantly within a week.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Tyla Childs,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great look and a very good leave on exfoliant. My only query would be the price however i continue to purchase it so....\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Karine,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Have used it for 2 months and now I can say it’s a great product. It’s clearly reduced my acne.,"Be patient because the product isn’t miraculous, as others one you need to take a time to see the results.\n",,,,,,,,,,
gardendaft,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I'm using this on the advice of beauty blogger Caroline Irons, but it's much too soon to tell what effect it's having. It feels good on my skin. May I suggest you change the packaging to something more flexible? The rigid bottle makes it difficult to know how much liquid is being dispensed.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Christina Wilson,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Has not helped my black heads whatsoever. Read loads of good reviews about it ""unblocking"" ports. It doesn't. Good cleanser, I have really sensitive skin and it doesn't affect it at all and it does feel clean just doesn't remove black heads which is why I got it. £3 cleanser wound have done the same.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
NicolaPash,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Really gets the dirt off even after cleansing and worked well.  Not effective on acne for me though, and incredibly pricy for the size.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
jimmybean,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Really good stuff to reduce blackheads, I use it in my chin and nose twice a day, only a small bottle though\n",,,,,,,,,,,
amelia,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Helps for spots , doesn’t dry out the skin.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Begonvil,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have been using about 3 weeks and did not see that much difference.And also its a bit expensive for the little size of bottle.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
May P.,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bought this because of amazing reviews from beauty vloggers and it does not disappoint with the exfoliating effect. In terms of reducing breakouts, it does not do much as I still get spots all over my face. It is a strong solution so I started with using twice a week then increased to evenings depending on the stinging effect it causes.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Irina,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Very good product. It exfoliated my skin after tge first use. It obviously did not heal my acnee so fast but I'm expecting to have a clear face in a couple of weeks. However very expensive, could be gound a lot cheaper on other websites. Still very satisfied and worth the money.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Don't use a cotton ball to apply. The cotton just absorbs all the product and it didn't work. I put it on neat with my hand after cleansing and left it on all night. One word. WOW. Buy it now\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’ve noticed an improvement in the appearance of my skin. It’s definitely smoother.,"Even though I have dry skin, I’ve not found any problems as I make sure I moisturise thoroughly after applying the product.\n",,,,,,,,,,
emz,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  good stuff noticed a difference after one use skin looked so much better. wish it was slightly cheaper. but it's good so worth it.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kathleen Manning,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Have used this product before and find it very good after cleansing and before moisturising.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mimi,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is absolutely amazing! Having used it for only a short period of time, I can already see how it has improved my skin so much, it’s a great exfoliator but also gentle on the skin. Would definitely recommend.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
star,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Only been using 3 days and can already see the change in redness to my skin. It is too expensive to put on a cotton pad I just do a few drops in my hands and put it all over my face twice a day.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Danni01011990,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I bought the travel size of this as a tester and within a couple of uses noticed a massive difference to my skin. I suffer with enlarged pores but this really helped. Unfortunately, I didn’t even get a week out of the product as you have to shake the fluid from the bottle and some was wasted because of this. But I will be buying more.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Nicola ,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Not had this long but first impressions are very good. It does go on a little shiny so if you don't like that feeling or texture stay clear but I love this product so far. I have open pores and have blackheads so it will be interesting to see if this product helps as it  claims to do. Leaves skin feeling lively and soft.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sandeep,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  It’s weird, I did love it and it was out of stock on amazon so bought it direct through Paula choice website. The one I received from them is a different (a lot thicker) consistency and smells stronger so I’m not sure whether this one is watered down or I got a dodgy one from Paula choices website (I haven’t used it yet)\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Adrian,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I always have this product in my routine ,i use it on my nose only because i have combination of skin type.",My pores now appear smaller .\n,,,,,,,,,,
Emily Matthews,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Good product for removing dead skin cells I like it very much, although it is pricey\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Tipanan Gracey,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Helps shrink your pores but could be too dry if you have dry skin! you need a good moisturiser but my skin deffo cleared up in a week\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Suzie,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Shocked at size of container travel size, my fault didn’t check\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Ms. D Thompson,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It’s tiny - so small I didn’t don’t realise it was in the box\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Charlotte Gregory,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great for scarring caused by spots reduces the redness after just 2-3 uses. Although very pricey for the amount you receive\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Anggy,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  An amazing product which really does help your skin, I've scraped most of my face products and just use this one as it's amazing and clears up my skin well.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Nicola,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Amazing! Really reduced my blemishes, noticeably! Some I've had for years are now almost gone after 3 weeks of use. It creates a really nice base for moisturiser and my skin feels much healthier. Pores don't look all that reduced yet, but I'm hoping with more time they will!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Letícia,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Omg I didn’t notice this was 30ml and it costed £13 wow\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Oyuna. B,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  A great product and it really make difference.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Autumn Stamford,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I was really reluctant to buy an expensive exfoliant and this is my first chemical exfoliant. I was not disappointed! I have had acne and bad skin texture for my entire teen and adult life and this is made a very noticeable improvement. Cannot recommend enough.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Laura Phoenix,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I've searched for years for an answer to my flare ups and this cured my face within 48 hours!!!,I don't want to exaggerate but WOW this is such a miracle for me.,"If you suffer with insanely sensitive, sore skin and adult acne then give this a try.\n",,,,,,,,,
Jodie,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great product and great for oily and problem prone skin. My skin had cleared up dramatically since using this and my blemishes fade a lot quicker. Would 100% recommend- this product is hard to get hold of so was very happy to find it on here.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ceri,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bought this for my partner for Christmas as  the one he had was running low.,He swears by this product and a small bottle has lasted him well over a year.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Tara,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  i love it!! 100% recommend! when i apply my skin feels super smooth and it looks so healthy and nourished for the entire day. immediately after cleansing i apply and it automatically feels like i just did a full facial. i love this so much i don’t even have the words\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Got this to try. Made me skin break out even more! It’s very oily for a product that it’s suppose to be for all types of skin! Waste of money\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I took a chance when purchased this product.,It works great. Reduced blackheads on my nose and chin. Blackhead are way less visible  and my skin looks better but it is bit on pricey side\n,,,,,,,,,,
Sandra Bouaffon,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Brilliant product, my skin can no longer go without this amazing formula! Would highly recommend this for those who may have had trouble with benzoyl peroxide like myself or those who have had trouble with acne, closed comedones and hyperpigmentation. Holy grail worthy.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Lauren Oliver,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  The best stuff in the world. Expensive for the size of the bottle when you can get it for 8 pound from other sites, probably expensive as its sold out everywhere else. But it is the best and the only thing that keeps my skin looking clear!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Alot of money for a very small amount, however, this is magic in a bottle. Definitely saw a difference in my skin tone and texture and even with the price tag for the small amount will be purchasing again. Would recommend.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
blue,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  it made my skin feel and look perfect\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mrs T Shaw,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Amazing product and definitely one I will not be doing without. What a difference it has made to my skin. Spots are clearing up faster when I break out and skin looms visibly clearer and brighter. 5 stars!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have horrible cystic acne.,I have tried the BHA 2% immediately when it came - my skin looks and feels so much better. Also pores look smaller!,I will write another review in a couple of weeks to see how things are in the long run.\n,,,,,,,,,
Ilina Ganeva,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It’s quite expensive but it’s totally worth it. It cleared my skin so well! Going to purchase the larger size bottle for sure!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Olga Lozan,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is like a black magic. Makes your pores looks smaller, your skin overall looks better. As an oily-combination skin person l would sugest not to use evey single day as it can be to harsh for skin. 3-4 times are more than enough.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
MARIAM,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Its suitable fir my skin..\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sarah Whitlam,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Super product for a really affordable price. I use this at night and have found my skin to be softer, clearer and brighter. The container itself is quite small, but a little amount really goes a long way with this product.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Mahwish Iqbal,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have sensitive skin and suffer from acne which can be very dry from time to time and this product does not overly dry the skin and skin feels so smooth after! Saw a difference in the size of my pores after 5 days, loving the results!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Mystery Shopper,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent product!  Clear skin and excellent on spots!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kirsti,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product is amazing\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Tamanah,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  It’s a very small bottle, didn’t last a week\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Margaret,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’d seen several people recommend this product and wanted to give it a try. I have sensitive skin and it’s worked wonderful for me. I’ll definitely purchase the bigger size next time !\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Nahid Aley,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Found the product to work overnight, blemishes near gone by morning and continued use has shrunk my pores and evened my skin tone (slight redness to cheeks before). I’ve never seen my skin look so even and feel so smooth!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Dagmara Klimczak,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I am not sure how effective the acid is if the lid wasn't probably closed.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Hannah,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great for my breakouts and has really helped soften my skin.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Olimpia Berto,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  recommended by a good friend of mine and also a dermatologist I follow on instagram, after reading all the positive reviews - i have to say i am also super happy about my purchase !!",skin feels softer after a couple of uses !\n,,,,,,,,,,
Yvonne hay,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bought the smaller bottle, after using for 2 weeks each night skin was clear, went on to buy large bottle, been using for a month, definitely stops spots emerging and pores appear reduced\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Miss Angela Hutcheson,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I do love this product however the bottle is very small. If using twice a day as per the reccomendation I only got one week out of it. I could definately see the results...\n,,,,,,,,,,,
HelenO,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I love this product. Although it’s very expensive, you only need a tiny bit each morning and night so it’s lasts ages. This is my second bottle and am definitely seeing a difference with my skin :)\n",,,,,,,,,,,
lucy welsh,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It’s very sticky on my skin and I’m not sure if that’s normal. It’s way too expensive for the size of the bottle and it’s not that easy to actually pour the liquid onto the cotton/hand. I’m not sure about the results yet.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Clairissa,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  it suggests to use it twice daily but i find for myself personally once a day is enough, twice will cause me to break out....still amazing stuff though will be buying more often\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Vicki Allan,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’ve only been using this for a couple of weeks but so far so good.  It’s good to be able to get a small size to test out before committing to the larger more expensive bottle.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
jake,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Noticed an improvement on textured skin on the forehead within a few days. It is quite drying as its an exfoliator so good idea to balance with a good cleanser and moisturizer.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Elizabeth Allen,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  saw results very quickly. would recommend. however next time i would probably buy it from somewhere else because i think it would be cheaper\n,,,,,,,,,,,
George Martin,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  haven’t had a chance to fully use the produce but just simply because of the size it’s a no. ITS TINY. i used it on my face this morning and it’s look the exact same. not worth it. please stay away from this seller.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jess Helen,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’m obsessed with this product! so good and feels amazing!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Abigail,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Only been using this product for a couple of days, and already there is a notable difference in the way my skin looks. it’s smoother, and my pores look a lot less clogged.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Bianca,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I’ve been using it for a few weeks already and it seems to be doing what it says. I can see an improvement, not how it says on the internet but I’m happy with the product\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cassandra C.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Recently I’ve added this into my daily skincare regimen. After using this for about month I’ve seen major improvement with my skin. Helps lighten hyperpigmentation and lessens pimple breakouts.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Hannah Lomas,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I feel like this has really helped the texture of my skin, reduced pores etc. Its a lot smaller than iI thought it was but I obviously didnt read it properly! I will be buying a bigger size\n",,,,,,,,,,,
"Mrs, J. M. Smith",5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Love all products from this range\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Alex,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I wanted the product to reduce my large pores as stated on the bottle, it did not.",made my skin spotty which I did not have before and my pores look worse\n,,,,,,,,,,
Sandra Mulholland,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Amazing product....If you want to ride yourself of built up products and blackheads on your skin, plus minimise your pores then this is The Best Product to do just that. Very happy customer.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Aminat Sow,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is a must, it reduce pores and evens skin tone and complexion! Honestly, look no further because product is best.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Danielle,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Good quality, dried your skin very quickly so make sure to moisturise after\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Chiqui Caguioa,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  One of the best face product I’ve used! Just after a week of using it alternating nights and my face have shown a huge difference. My pores are minimised and looks glowy. Thanks!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Aida,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I only used it 3 times and I can see a difference on my skin. Absolutely amazing product. Not sure I’ll ever buy something else.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Adorable Jane,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Nice product for a softer skin\n,,,,,,,,,,,
J Whitaker,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Good for removing blackheads I think most of them are gone but can be over stripping so if you have dry/combination skin probably only use 2-3 times a week.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jen,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  But expensive condsering the side of the bottle but good stuff\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mia Simspon-Sullivan,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Has helped my skin so much, reduced scaring and some bumps on skin. Just be careful and make sure to use spf and a good moisturiser after.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
souhila,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  The product arrived in time. I’ve been using it for roughly 3 weeks now and I’m so far very pleased with it. My skin looks so much clearer\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Andre Daniel,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I've been using this in the morning and at night, following the instructions for the past 3 weeks, and I've seen good results.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Great product ! I suffer with oily White lumps on my skin and this product is slowly getting rid of them , will definitely order again .\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I HAVE USED THIS EXFOLIATOREVERY DAY ,AND I HAVE FOUND IT VERY GOOD FOR MY SKIN.",GOOD VALUE AS YOU ONLY NEED A LITTLE.\n,,,,,,,,,,
alexandra hewitt,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Didn't realise how small this bottle was and dont think after using it for a week its exceptional.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kirsty ,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product left my skin feeling thoroughly clean and has smoothed it out a lot! My pores have shrunk too! I have recommended this to many people already:)\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kornelija Andrijauskaite,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  So far I love it! Leaves my skin soft and smooth, hopefully pores will shrink over time, but for now really recommend this product\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Vanessa Belleau,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I like the effect that this product has on my face. It is helping with making some of my marks disappear.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Abby ,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Love this product, it’s helped so much with my problem skin. I actually have clear skin days now! Will be buying the bigger bottle next time.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Fekete Dalma,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I ordered it as I had acne on my cheeks and it cleared them up almost perfectly after just a few days.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sly,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Happy with first small sample size bottle so ordered another. Seems to be working so far. Delivery was promp.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
darren britton,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Monica,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Haven’t tried it yet but it’s quite expensive for a little bottle that you get!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kai,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  AMAZING!!! Would 100% order this again. Easy application, works so well and lasts a long time for the size of the bottle! Amazing product.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Geraldine,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Great for calming skin and leaving it feeling soft and balanced. After 1 week no redness, less tired looking and even tone.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jaja,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Best exfoliant I’ve used. It is gentle and within a couple of days you already see results. Skin is tighter and brilliant.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
jun xiao,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Nice lotion ,good stuff noticed a difference after one use skin looked so much better.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Really did nothing to my skin. The price is ridiculous especially as it does nothing.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Roxanne,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  The product is amazing! Saw a difference after the first few days. Bottle is a bit weird though\n,,,,,,,,,,,
ANANDA NAIR,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Really works, I have tiny bumps on my forehead and after 1 weeks use they have already largely cleared up!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Emma Rodgers,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Love this product! Skin looks amazing, so much smoother and brighter!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
caru coetzee,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Great product, not too harsh, recommended to only use in the evenings if you will be experiencing sun exposure in the day.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great product from an excellent seller with first class service and value for money.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Heather Grant,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Absolutely fantastic product! So impressed with this product!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bought for hyperpigmentation on face , not made any difference but l  does make skin feel grso\n",,,,,,,,,,,
rebecca davies,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I saw this advertised on This Morning and decided to try it.It works for me and even bought a small one for my sister.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cw0100,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I love this product, really closes my pores over and helps fight against breakouts. Love it.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Lilly Bean,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I use this regularly and normally it arrives just fine. This time it arrived leaking and damaged. I’m disappointed.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Miss S. K. Hartley,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product works well and his gentle on my sensitive skin. Helps to clear my miliar spots. And reduces redness.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kate,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Product does absolutely nothing, really disappointed. Bottle is tiny and not worth the money. Makes skin worse.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Ezinne,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Nothing in my package\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Juani,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  So extremely small to expensive for the size of the product very disappointing\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Brilliant product.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
'S. S,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It helped in reducing the acne and bumps on my chin. So far applying everyday.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
kathleen jamieson,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Excellent my skin felt amazing, a little pricey but worth the purchase.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
mandy shorten,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I loved this product really notice a difference in my skin quick and simple to use\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jill Caranzo,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Literally my favourite skin care product ever. Has made my skin so soft and clear\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Liezl Scott,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I saw a difference in the size of my pores immediately! Love this!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
jessica,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Good exfoliant, but tiny! Two weeks and it’s finished.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
L.Reznikova,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Brilliant, skin-smoothing and life tightening product. The best I have tried.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have found this product really good for my skin, it looks so much better.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
mariam saud,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  It’s absolutely tiny , like a tester not a product that will last a while\n",,,,,,,,,,,
ALEX MCLEOD,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Would recommend this product, leaves skin feeling clean, soft and looks brighter.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
P A Weinbren,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Wonderful product as usual from Paula. Resolves breakouts\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Leila,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It is a good product.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Greta Reif Janus,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Thanks\n,,,,,,,,,,,
JasJay,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Very good! Sensitive enough for my skin!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
beth schratz,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Made my skin look so glowy and helped to clear my acne so much\n,,,,,,,,,,,
PAMELA ROBERTSON,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great product.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Marta,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Quick results\n,,,,,,,,,,,
MC,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent results on first use\n,,,,,,,,,,,
E,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  So overpriced and did nothing but feed my malassezia\n,,,,,,,,,,,
D,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  £5 more expensive than actual price for no  reason\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Lisa,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Broke me out!! Glad I bought the small one\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  like alice in wonderland potion small\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Richolas ,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  My GF’s Skin is Popping\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Leaves skin feeling sticky... disappointed!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
tassneem yousif,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Still testing the product out.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Dada Milano,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Magic in a bottle\n,,,,,,,,,,,
S and R,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent exfoliation\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Product is fine but is so small for the price!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Hadiatou Jallow,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Best I have ever used\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Luara,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  A fantastic product\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Dagmara A.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Very good product.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
dawn watts,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Amazing does exactly what it says it’s awesome.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ye,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Works great, but definitely start by using no more than 3-4 times a week and gradually use more otherwise it would make the skin too sensitive. By starting small it works great with immediate results. Skin feels smoother and more glowy.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Wow! I have been using Paula's Choice Exfoliatier for some months on an occasional basis, 3 times a week maybe.",I previously had awful pigmentation and age spots. Well these have faded massively. I am immensely impressed!,"Also I have the travel size and the product formula really lasts, it goes a long long way!\n",,,,,,,,,
Alina Barbu,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  After 2 days using this serum i saw a big diference , my acnee is gone. I can not belive was so easy with this. My favorite for sure\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Laura Scott,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Exactly as I imagined it would be\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Maria,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product is absolutely fantastic.,I have been struggling with my oily skin for years now. I get hormonal cystic acne around my chin and jaw area each month but in recent months my acne has extended further to my forehead and cheeks with an increase in oil production and visibly clogged pores and texture issues recently.,I have tried every cleansing regime imaginable. Most had no effect on my clogged pores and acne. I decided to research ways of getting rid of skin texture caused by whiteheads and blackheads and that’s when I came across this product. So many YouTubers and dermatologists recommended it so I decided to try it.,"I got the small bottle first just incase it didn’t agree with my skin. I have used it TWICE but from the very first application I seen results within hours, no lie. This product goes on like a light tonic but has a bit of a dewy feel to it that goes away after it dries / absorbs. Honestly I had it on for a couple of hours and went to check my skin in the mirror and noticed results. My skins redness had calmed, inflamed bumps and surface pimples had reduced significantly. Active spots were drying out and my skin texture was somewhat improved. This product will not cure oil production but it does a fantastic job at banishing the effects of excess oil on the skin. It’s a clarifying product without being overly stripping. I would be prone to dry patches in some areas of my face and whilst I did notice some slight dry patches after using this it was nothing to be overly concerned about and more just the spots drying out. You can use your normal moisturiser over the top of this so anybody who is afraid of it drying out their skin, fear not.",Honestly if you are struggling with clogged pores and build up that a normal cleanser can’t reach - GET THIS PRODUCT.\n,,,,,,,
Hayley,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This works! I have had mild to moderate acne and rough, congested, dull skin since becoming pregnant with child. It's been nearly 4 years and I've tried lots of cleansers and exfoliants with no luck. I have sensitive skin and was very reluctant to try the stronger acid based products but I wish I'd have tried this sooner. Its been just under a week and I've already seen a very visible difference in my skin. My skin is baby smooth, my black heads have disappeared, my cystic acne has reduced in size and I'm feeling confident for the first time in 4 years. I wish I'd have taken before and after photos but I assumed that this would be another waste of money just like all of the other bottles currently under my sink. The travel size bottle is fiddly to use but I put about 5 drops into the palm of my hand and wipe it all over my face after cleansing, toning and using hyaluronic acid. I've been doing this twice a day to start with and will reduce to just evenings now that I feel my skin is under control. I will definitely be buying the larger size once I have finished the 30ml.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Stardust,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I wish I’d found this product much sooner! I‘ve always struggled with my skin, and as I approach my 40s I was just becoming more and more frustrated as I’ve always taken good care of it.",I started researching chemical exfoliants to improve my skin tone and this kept coming up as a ‘holy grail’ product.,I’ve been using it once a day for just over a week now and honestly cannot believe the results so far. The milia on my chin and forehead have almost gone; the blackheads on my nose are less noticeable and my skin tone has completely evened out and my skin looks healthy and glowing.,Highly recommended. I also love that Paula’s Choice does samples and travel sizes in many of their products so you can see if something works for you before committing £30-£40 to the full size product.\n,,,,,,,,
paige mcnicol,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I use this at night only because I have sensitive skin. I have very complicated skin, big pores, stubborn blackheads, small bumps and fewer big spots on my neck and face as well.","This is the best skincare product I've ever purchased. After a day I noticed a subtle change and after a week my skin has hugely improved, it's softer with no spots and I can barely see my pores which are also clean, there's no more tiny bumps on my cheeks and forehead either.","Keep an eye on how harsh this is for your skin, I tried 2 times a day and it was a bit too strong but once a day is perfect. I stopped wearing foundation while using this to keep my skin as clear as possible to get the best effect.\n",,,,,,,,,
John Smith,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have mixed feelings so far. I definitely noticed overall my skin hue shifting to the brighter side having used this for just over a week after applying the Toner. As for spots, it did greatly reduce the size of a pesky spot by my temple however it hasn't yet completely gotten rid of it, I can still slightly feel it when running my hand over the area. I havent noticed a visible difference with hyperpigmentation scars though. However they do say it takes around 12 weeks for skin to completely cycle and I've only used it for just over a week.","Once you apply the exfoliant it does leave a  visible shine to your face, when applying this during the day I use blotting sheets to help curb this.","The biggest fault is that, for the size its overpriced, and it wont last you long because to apply it you have to soak the entire cotton pad with about 15 drops. I have no idea why they'd charge a premium on the exfoliants, considering the Toner costs less for a much bigger yield.","But alas, I guess some executive down at Paula's Choice really wants to buy a cute new Porsche, so f- you.\n",,,,,,,,
Ryan B.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I wish I bought this a long time ago! Such a good product if you struggle with hormonal/cystic acne. I personally use this at night after cleansing and washing my face and before moisturising. If you also have sensitive skin aswell as acne prone skin I'd say dont use it every night, just a few times a week. Even if your not particularly sensitive start using it a few times a week and work yourself up to using it daily because it can be a little drying on the skin so make sure you use a good moisturiser! But it does work so well on acne, best thing I've tried for cystic spots! Made my skin look really good, which is a rarity for me.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
CJH,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This is the face product my daughter has been waiting for. Very light to apply, she loves the way it goes on and I noticed the improvement in her skin in 5 days. She has had Roaccutane treatment for acne and whilst much better she needs to be very careful what she uses on her face. She had a breakout after using an old moisturiser (now in the bin). She loves Paula's Choice.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Megan Stapleton,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I didn't quite realise how small the 13 pound bottle was when I ordered it so something to be aware of! However, this product is amazing. While I don't use it on my face often as I find it quite drying (I have dry skin) but on actual blackheads it is amazing. I have had a large blackhead for two years that nothing has been able to shift but application of this twice a day for a few days has honestly had the biggest impact. Amazing!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Vicki Jerreat,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I started to break out in the worst cystic acne - it was so painful I could barely move my jaw to talk or eat. In sheer desperation I forked out for this because it had so many good reviews. I do not exaggerate when I say that it’s worth every penny! It did what prescription medication could not. It quickly took down inflammation and reduced pain. Within three days, the lumps were flat. Not gone, but very much improved. It’s pricey, but a little goes a long way.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Annie,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product works.  I’m in my early 60s and I felt that my skin was looking a bit dull, a bit lack lustre, so after watching a review about this product on the This Morning programme I thought I would try it.  It is brilliant I noticed a difference in my complexion after only a couple of uses.  I use it when I get out of the shower in the morning, wiping it on with a cotton pad and then applying my daily serum and moisturiser.  My skin looks much brighter, clearer and feels smoother.  A lovely product and I will be buying again.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  As someone who appears to be allergic to most things I put anywhere near my face, I was struggling to find an effective exfoliation product.  Went into research mode and this one kept coming up on any list I checked.  I have only been using it for a few days and have noticed a big change in my skin texture.  Mote importantly thought, I did not have an allergic reaction!!  Highly recommend.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Matt,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  It's very difficult to tell which skin products actually make a difference, given that I'm using about 1000 at any one time. But I'm pretty sure this one has actually made my skin less red, and smoother. It's pretty expensive but you only use a tiny bit at a time, so it lasts a while - I think this little 30ml bottle lasted me over a month, using it twice daily.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Mrs. A. E,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bought for our 14 year old. The redness went down but getting him to put it on twice a day just doesnt happen. We still have spots.  I would try the miniature before you spend a fortune incase this doesnt work for you\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Joan,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  If you have sensitive skin like me or are acne prone, stay away from this. It was way too harsh and within a week, it gave me breakouts I’ve never gotten before.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
.,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I do believe it can help as my face did look ‘cleaner’ as use but for me, it made my skin very dry and I broke out. I just think it wasn’t suitable for my skin, which is a shame as it does genuinely seem like it’s helped others. For sensitive skin, I wouldn’t recommend using it twice a day like it says. Maybe once a day, 2/3 times a week to begin with.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
JimJam,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  When I bought it I hadn’t realised how small the bottle was so I initially thought it was quite expensive for the size. After using it for a few weeks it’s not the most important skin care product I own! My skin hasn’t been this clear in years! I’m def buying the big bottle next, worth every penny!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
LJ Knox,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I bought this for my daughter as she has very sensitive skin and suffers from spots. She said its very good and it really does appear to help her skin. So i would recommend this going on what my daughter has said about it\n,,,,,,,,,,,
andrea mcconnologue,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Fantastic product.  My skin is noticeable clearer and softer . Honestly amazed at how fast I saw results . I use it in the morning and night . You need a good moisturiser and I also use factor 50 for my face to protect it .\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  After years fighting with my adult normal-combination acne prone skin I found this product. This little bottle lasts ages (I apply it with my hands). My skin feels way smoother when I use it and my spots fade faster. I use other AHA and BHA but this one is my fave along with the The Ordinary's Lactic Acid 5% (do not use them together),I actually bought the full size. Very happy with thid product.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  A little disappointed as it cost £15 for a 30ml bottle. It started to smooth my skin, but then a few days later it made me breakout with terrible acne. I’ve had to go to the doctors for treatment.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Miss H,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bought for daughter’s teenage skin. Nothing was working and then I saw this recommended. It is expensive but I was prepared to try it if it helped her. Her skin began to improve immediately.  Two weeks in and her skin has improved considerably, I hope it will continue to help.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Lchilds,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Amazing! This lotion has dramatically improved my skins appearance.  It took a few days for my skin to get use to it, to start I had a few dry flakey patches, but now my skin looks more refined and pores less visible.  Blackheads on nose and chin greatly improved too.  Will definitely be buying again. X\n",,,,,,,,,,,
MitG,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Did nothing for keratosis Pilaris. If anything, it made it more noticeable and red. Have used on my face as well, and it seems fine, but after 3 weeks there isn’t much difference- at least not enough to warrant the price.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
J M Church,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I bought this product  recently for my 18 year old daughter as I had read several reviews on it via social media.  So far her skin is improving having suffered from breakouts and blackheads.  I'm sure I will be re-stocking again. Thank you.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
tayyeba,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Amazing product, it’s been 10 days I’ve been using this and have seen a massive response in my skin it’s more brighter and clean. Highly recommended\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Sarah,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bought this after it being recommended by a blogger and it’s great when used with another product for hydration. My skin is so much clearer.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
YYxx,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Works great. However, the 2% BHA/ Salicylic Acid solution costs half from The Ordinary. It is sinply overpriced.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
K MCLEAN,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Almost within a few days of using this I can feel a difference in my skin. Now I've never exfoliated before but from now on I will be using this product as part of my skin routine.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
V. Cufalo,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Highly recommend this product.  Skin feels significantly smoother within days!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kate,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Don't think I will buy again,Seems to irritate my skin .\n,,,,,,,,,,
M. Mawson,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I thought at £30 I was getting the full size but it’s tiny\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Faisal,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Does what it’s suppose to very well but is a bit on the expensive side. You should also not use it every day because it’s pretty strong stuff. The sweet spot is twice a week for me.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Good exfoliant. Skin looks better. Pleased. Small travel size. Also good for older skin\n,,,,,,,,,,,
gill,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent exfoliant. Will definitely order again.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Agnieszka Sieron,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Closing the big pores and long lasting\n,,,,,,,,,,,
pauline,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Doing wonders for my skin\n,,,,,,,,,,,
G R,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Easy and effectual.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Rachael,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Very effective. Will definitely buy again.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Lindsay,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Fantastic!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
JH210,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Really great product, but bare in mind that this is very small\n",,,,,,,,,,,
nena,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Can’t tell how well it’s working yet but will definitely repurchase\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Soha,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This didn’t do anything for me, so I wouldn’t recommend. Too expensive and bottle is not practical.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
David,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Tiny, not worth it. Doesnt exfoliate skin at all\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Luis Fernando Marchiori,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Is excellent for acne !!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
cathy hilton,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Worked well - love it!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Letitia Orsini,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Très bon produit, j'ai commencé depuis 2 mois et je vois la différence. C'est un acid bha, donc un acid qui fonctionne en profondeur (points noirs), mais pas de quoi à voir peur quand même, il est assez doux. Pour commencer ne soyez pas très impatients, commencez 3 fois par semaine surtout le soir (les acides sont toujours à appliquer le soir et toujours avec une protection solaire en journée si non on risque de faire plus de mal que de bien). Petit à petit argumentéz les applications, jusqu'à arriver à 1 soir sur 2. Garder bien en tête qu'un effet de 'purging' peut arriver (ça dure entre 2 et 6 semaines, et en fait on a des boutons qui apparaissent) car bcp de gens se disent que c'est pas bon et ils arrêtent, l'explication est facile, nous exfolions nos peau mortes, alors c'est normal de 'déterrer' certains boutons ou points noirs. C'est un produit que je continuerai à acheter, je le trouve un peu cher mais ça dure longtemps. La gamme Paula's choise est très bien, c'est juste que des fois on trouve des produits equivalents moins cher et tout aussi efficaces. Déjà commencez par ne plus utiliser les cosmétiques avec alcool dedans, ou parfum ou huile essentielle ( mais les huiles bio et pressés à froid sont excellents car la peau les accepté facilement), également mettez tous les jours une protection solaire 30 minimum, été comme hiver, vous allez voir votre peau vous remerciera.","Si vous avez trouvé mon commentaire utile n'hésitez pas de cliquer, merci 😊\n",,,,,,,,,,
Biendara,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Paula’s Choice hat tolle Hautpflege, das kann man nicht leugnen. Sie ist auf jeden Fall auf einer Höhe mit der Hautpflege aus Südkorea und Japan. Allerdings sind die Pflegeprodukte aus dem asiatischen Raum um einiges günstiger (bis auf ein paar High End Marken), und es ist die gleiche gute Qualität und die gleichen Inhaltsstoffe.","Das Produkt hier an sich ist super, allerdings habe ich mich extrem darüber geärgert dass es für 14 Euro nur so ein Miniding gibt, ich finde es eine bodenlose Frechheit!","Im Original kostet es 35 Euro, 118ml und ich kann jedem nur raten lieber dann 20 Euro mehr zu bezahlen als 14 Euro an dieses Mini-Fläschchen zu verschwenden.\n",,,,,,,,,
Mara,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Habe das Produkt seit ca einem Monat im Gebrauch und habe davor gefühlt alles schon ausprobiert gegen meine Akne.,Habe hormonell bedingte Akne und bis auf die Pille kann ich dagegen leider nichts machen. Dachte ich. Hoffnung stirbt ja bekanntlich zuletzt. Deswegen habe ich von der Ernährungsumstellung bis hin zu Nahrungsergänzung und verschiedensten akne Masken und Seren alles ausprobiert gefühlt.,"Bin durch die Foren gegangen die man so zum Thema Akne alles so findet weil mein Hautarzt, der auch nur alle halbe Jahre mal einen Termin frei hat, mir auch bisher nicht helfen konnte. Dipalen, was ich als letztes ausprobieren durfte, hat meine Haut dann komplett zerstört. Meine Haut sah aus als hätte ich Neurodermitis oder so etwas. Nach diesem missglückten Versuch bin ich immer wieder auf den Namen Paulas choice gestoßen.","Habe gedacht, komm probierste das halt auch noch aus.  Alle die unter Akne leiden wissen, das man sich an alles klammert was einem nur ein bisschen Hoffnung gibt."," Okay. Hier bestellt und direkt 2 mal täglich angewendet. Weil doppelt hält ja bekanntlich besser :D  auch wenn manche in den Rezensionen schreiben "" langsam dran gewöhnen"" ..","Schon nach wenigen Tagen hat meine Haut angefangen viiiiiel besser zu werden. Nach nur einem Monat kann ich sagen. Es ist das aller erste Produkt, ( und glaubt mir ich habe so einiges in meinem Schrank) was wirkung zeigt. Ich habe bisher keinen einzigen tiefsitzen Pickel bekommen der Knoten verursacht und diese hässlichen Narben, die ich leider noch habe. Davor habe ich die quasi übernacht täglich produziert. Kleine Mitesser kommen hier und da aber da sind Welten zwischen meiner Haut vor einem Monat und jetzt. Vielen Dank für dieses mega tolle Produkt.",Jetzt denkt man sich.. warum nur 4 Sterne.. es ist einfach sehr teuer meiner Meinung nach und ich vermute es geht auch günstiger..,Aber Geld hin oder her. Für dieses Lebensgefühl gebe ich dieses Geld aus.,"Und ein kleiner Tipp. Wenn ihr ausdrückt oder die Finger nicht davon lassen könnt. Schaut das ihr an eine Kanüle dran kommt um die Pickel aufzustechen,  bevor ihr es ohne probiert oder mit diesen komedogenstecher aus dem Internet. Die Spitze verbiegt nämlich total schnell und können bei weitem nicht so viel wie kanülen.\n",,,
Cliente online,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  J'ai reçu un produit de voyage correspondant à peu près à 2 échantillons, ai commandé ce produit car recherche des alternatives à mes lotions CLINIQUE utilisées depuis plus de quinze ans car parviennent à retirer tout maquillage tenace obstruant les pores (autobronzant notamment). Ce produit ne nettoie pas aussi bien et est plutôt adapté aux peaux acnéiques en le laissant poser la nuit pour bénéficier des bienfaits de l'acide salicylique. Du coup, je ne regrette pas de ne pas avoir commandé une taille standard. Si toutefois mon avis vous a paru utile, merci de votre like, restant à votre disposition pour toute question, excellente journée, ED !\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Ophe123a,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Von dem Produkt habe ich mir versprochen, das meine Aknenarben, Pigmentflecken(auch Narben) weggehen und sich meine Poren verkleinern. Vorab ich bin zwischen 20-25 Jahre alt und Ich habe das Produkt zwei mal am Tag angewendet, so wie es auf der Packung vorgeschrieben ist. Ich benutze den BHA Exfloriant schon ca 2 Wochen lang. Klar die Haut regeneriert sich erst nach 4-6 Wochen, bis dahin sollte man sich auf nicht allzuviele Veränderungen des Hautbildes einstellen. Jedenfalls habe ich nach zwei Wochen bemerkt, das meine Haut viel weicher ist und sich ,,glatter"" anfühlt. So als wären meine Narben etwas zurückgegangen. Bei meinen Poren hat sich nichts verändert und nur minimal bei meinen Pigmentflecken. Ich werde es weiterhin benutzen und sehen was sich nach 6 Wochen für Ergebnisse herraustellen lassen. Trotztdem würde ich dem BHA Exfloriant nicht allzuviel zusprechen.","Zur Textur: Es ist sehr flüssig, kein Gel und keine Cremige Konsistenz. Es riecht nach fast nichts und zieht seeeehr schnell ein.","Man hat, trotz dessen das es sehr schnell einzieht, einen gesunden Glanz auf der Haut, was mir sehr gefällt und die Haut auch ein bisschen strahlen lässt.","Achja beim ersten Mal auftragen habe ich ein ganz ganz minimales Kribbeln gespührt. Es ist nichts rot geworden oder so. Aber jetzt spüre ich gar nichts mehr, so als würde ich mir Wasser ins Gesicht verteilen.",Ich hoffe die Rezension hat jemandem weitergeholfen.\n,,,,,,,
Kelsey Bollum ,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Not the bottle they are advertising in the picture, at the end it does say 'travel size', but it is a tiny bottle for $40 when on the website its $10 for the same product. Returned immediately.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  ich bin 44 Jahre alt, und habe über Jahre Probleme mit meiner Gesichtshaut gehabt ich habe sehr viele Unterlagerungen und Verhornungsstörung. Meine neue Kosmetikerin hat mir dieses Produkt empfohlen weil sie auch in der Apotheke arbeitet ich bin sprachlos von dem Ergebnis. Meine Haut ist glatter, viel reiner und die in Unterlagerungen sind teilweise völlig verschwunden. Dazu habe ich mir noch dieses Waschgel gekauft was es in einer blauen Flasche gibt und das nehme ich morgens und abends genauso wie dieses Produkt hier. Wenn ich sage dass es wirklich einzigartig ist dann können Sie mir das glauben ich habe in meinem ganzen Leben noch nie solch eine Haut im Gesicht gehabt ich kann dieses Produkt nur empfehlen ich würde sogar offiziell Werbung dafür machen so begeistert bin ich.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Kathrin H.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Zu Anfang muss ich erwähnen, dass eine Rezession einer Käuferin hier mich zum Kauf bewegt hat. Ich konnte mich in ihren Worten zu 100% wiederfinden: alles probiert von Cremes, Lotionen, leben ohne Zucker, Ernährungsumstellung. Nichts hat geholfen. Da ist man schon einmal mehr als verzweifelt.",Meine letzte Option war also Paula‘s Choise. Was hatte ich schon zu verlieren.,Ich habe die kleine Größe zum Probieren bestellt. Man weiß ja nie....,"Am Anfang habe ich es täglich 2x auf die Betroffene Stellen (bei mir überwiegend am Kinn, und das sehr deutlich) aufgetragen. Ich habe zwar eine empfindliche Haut, aber gemerkt habe ich nicht. Schon nach zwei Tagen konnte ich den Erfolg sehen: die Pickel wurden doch tatsächlich besser, Rötungen und Pickelmale waren gemildert und diese verhassten kleinen gelben Pickelchen waren auch weniger. Das war echt schwer zu glauben!!!","Also habe ich es weiter jeden Tag 2x genommen. Nach einer Woche jedoch merkte ich, dass es wieder etwas „schlimmer“ wurde. Da fängt man dann doch zu zweifeln an, ob die anfängliche Euphorie nicht übertrieben war. Ich habe es aber trotzdem weiter durchgezogen. Einfach mal aus Neugier was passiert.","Jetzt nach 4 Wochen kann ich sagen: es hat sich gelohnt. Pickel habe ich so gut wie keine mehr. Und wenn doch, dann sind sie so klein, dass sie nicht auffallen. Meine Haut sieht deutlich gesünder aus. Die roten Male sind deutlich zurück gegangen. Ich bin einfach nur happy nach einer langen Qual und tausend verschiedenen Mittelchen und nutzlosen Tips/Hautärzten.",Durchhalten und probieren. Diese Mittel ist der Hammer!!!!!\n,,,,,
Shareece,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Terrible. Item is smaller than my thumb! DO NOT purchase this from amazon as it looks nothing like image shown.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
brittany h,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  So small for the price wow.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Utilice este producto mañana y noche como ponía en el paquete y los primeros días todo fue bien, pero a partir de la primera semana mi piel antes relativamente libre de acne ahora esta plagada de granos  sobre todo por la zona de la barbilla y laterales de la cara. Fue dejar de usarlo hace un par de días y mi piel ha vuelto a mejorar, pero adjunto foto para que veais el destrozo, aunque ahora la mayoría de granos están ya curados. Muy decepcionada, no uséis este producto si tenéis tendencia acneica, en vez de libraros del acne os saldrá mas, y ojo con las pieles grasas. Paulas choice siempre ofrece reembolsos a este tipo de reacciones con sus productos, espero que Amazon proceda igual.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
HAUS OF PJC,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  READ AND CONFIRM SIZE OF THE PRODUCT FIRST BEFORE **clicking* purchase!!!!,This product is amazing but it’s a scam to purchase a 30ML bottle for 30 bucks. When on Paula’s website 30ML is 10 bucks. I’m return this ASAP. Save your money and buy a bigger bottle or directly from Paula’s Choice!\n,,,,,,,,,,
C,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Cette lotion est très efficace. La marque Paula's Choice est géniale, encore une fois je suis convaincue.","En l'espace d'une semaine environ ce produit a anéantie la poussé d'acné qui me défigurait depuis plus d'un mois en cause d'une alimentation à base de tartiflette, raclette, croziflette, chocolats et compagnie depuis décembre (la montagne, ça ne vous gagne pas forcément du coup)"," En revanche, faire très ATTENTION au contour des yeux. J'ai pour habitude de mettre mes produits (rétinol et vitamine c inclus) sur tout le visage, sans faire de zoning, mais cette lotion m'a provoqué une très forte irritation qui dure maintenant depuis plus de deux semaines sur le contour des yeux. Il pèle et est hypersensible.\n",,,,,,,,,
Pschetschek,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Update : am 10 Mai war die kleine Flasche erst leer !,Das hier ist meine erste Bewertung überhaupt ! Da ich aber nur mit den Augen rolle wenn ich die anderen Bewertungen lese muss ich doch mal eine schreiben .,Erstens wenn man 30ml bestellt bekommt man 30ml für den bestellten Preis da brauch ich mich danach nicht beschweren . Und es ist so klein weil es eine Probe ist was ich persönlich toll finde falls es jemand nicht verträgt .,Zumal finde ich den Preis au CH gar nicht teuer . Ich denke jeder wo Probleme hat und etliche Kosmetik Produkte auch von der Kosmetikerin gekauft hat weiß wovon ich sprechen da gehen hochwertige Produkte ab 60€ erst los . Da finde ich den Preis hier echt human für ein hochwertiges Produkt . Wenn sich jemand am Preis stört soll er zu, Dm gehen und sich ne Creme für 5€ kaufen dann hat man allerdings kein Ergebnis .,Das nächste ist man sollte immer neue Produkte am Handgelenk testen und nicht im Gesicht wenn man danach kacke aussieht selbst schuld . Als Nächstes dauert ein haut Zyklus 6 Wochen das heißt die Haut braucht lange um dich an ein Produkt zu gewöhnen somit kann bei einigen am Anfang das Gegenteil eintreten und das Produkt verschlimmert den Zustand zunächst .,So jetzt zu meiner eigentlichen Bewertung.,Seid ich keine Hormone nehme habe extrem Probleme mit meiner Haut immer wieder Pickel etc. nach 6 Jahren habe ich es einigermaßen in den Griff bekommen . Nun bin bin ich auf dieses Produkt gestoßen und sag einfach nur wow !!!! Keine Poren mehr ! So eine glatte Haut hatte ich zuletzt als Teenager . Das Produkt ist ziemlich dünnflüssig deswegen haltet es MEINER Meinung nach ziemlich lange.,Hätte ich das vorher entdeckt wären mir viele Pleiten erspart geblieben . Wo nichts gebracht haben und viel Geld gekostet haben .,Mein Fazit eine einfach mega !,Ich kann es nur empfehlen.,Und bitte denkt dran jede Haut ist anders und manche brauchen um ein Ergebnis zu haben 6 Wochen :)\n
Sanchez emilie,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Produit de qualité qui permet de corriger les problèmes d imperfections ( tâches, point noir..) très agréable à mettre de par sa texture et son odeur très légère. Une peau plus fine et bien plus belle! Je recommande cette lotion exfoliante qui est top!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Andrea,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Sehr wenig Produkt für den Preis. Nicht ergiebig und hatte bis zur letzten Nutzung keinerlei Verbesserung gebracht\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Aprile Fitgerald,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I just received my order and I guess I didn’t read what I was purchasing very well, I payed over $30 for a travel size product that cost $10 on the website, needless to say I will be returning it,. Totally disappointed.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cristina,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ho acquistato questo prodotto con la speranza che migliorasse la grana della mia pelle e svolgesse il suo lavoro di peeling, ma onestamente dopo due mesi di utilizzo la mia pelle non è assolutamente migliorata né peggiorata, quindi su di me non ha avuto alcun effetto! Peccato perché dalle recensioni sembrava essere un ottimo acquisto.","La nota positiva è che la boccetta piccola mi dura ancora, ma purtroppo per il mio tipo di pelle (mista con zona T tendente al grasso e macchioline qua e là dovute al post acne) non funziona affatto 👎🏻\n",,,,,,,,,,
Denise,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich trage es abends nach Reinigung und Toner mit einem Wattepad auf, lasse es einige Minuten wirken und verwende dann die üblichen Seren und Feuchtigkeitscreme oder Öl.",Die Produkte werden viel schneller und besser absorbiert als vorher.,"Kein stechendes Gefühl, wie bei manch anderen säurehaltigen Produkten und keine Irritationen auf meiner sensiblen Haut. Habe sehr schnell eine signifikante Verbesserung festgestellt: weniger Unreinheiten und Pickel, verfeinerte Poren und fast keine spürbaren Unebenheiten mehr unter der Haut.",Ich bin begeistert!\n,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ho acquistato questo prodotto come rimpiazzo di un siero all'acido salicilico di un altro famoso brand che però non è disponibile da mesi  perchè l'azienda lo sta riformulando. Questo non mi piace, non è un toner, è praticamente un olio, è unto, lucida, non lascia un bel finish sulla pelle, e costa davvero un capitale!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jennifer ,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich benutze das Produkt nun seit 4 Wochen und kann bis jetzt keine Verbesserung feststellen. Ich habe empfindliche Haut und nach dem auftragen ein gerötetes Gesicht. Angeblich für sensible Haut geeignet. Kann ich nicht bestätigen! Die Poren sind bis jetzt auch nicht kleiner geworden. Ich werde es aufbrauchen, aber nicht wieder kaufen.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
GORECKI NICOLAS,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Top ! Au bout de 4 jours de tests à raison d’une application matin ET soir je vois déjà les effets ! Le grain de peau est plus net et les imperfections commencent déjà à s’estomper. Dans mes rituels matin/soir, je fais en premier un nettoyant visage exfoliant, puis une lotion tonique, ensuite ce produit, et pour terminer un sérum laser X3, et en dernier une crème jour ( ou nuit ) à l’acide hyaluronique pour hydrater. Je suis pleinement satisfait. Je commanderais certainement d’autres produits de la marque :)\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Roby,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Cosa dire? Mai provato skin più buono, un nome ed una garanzia!",La bottiglia è davvero piccola ( 30 ml ) ma ne servono poche gocce da mettere su un dischetto di cotone mattina e sera.,Deterge la pelle e restringe i pori dilatati.,"Il prodotto non va sciacquato e va usato come un normale tonico dopo la detersione del viso, applicare successivamente una crema.\n",,,,,,,,
Clem,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  J'ai un peu mixte avec excès de sébum sur la zone T avec mes pores dilatés, des points noirs sur le nez, taches de soleil assez prononcé et sur tout le visage et tendance à la couperose. Je pensais impossible de trouver un produit qui pouvait m'aider sur tous ce aspects mais après moins d'une semaine avec se produit j'ai vu mes rougeurs très atténuées, ma peau ne brille plus, mes pores sont resserrés et les taches de soleil dont j'essayais de me débarrasser par tous les moyens depuis très longtemps se sont énormément estompées. Je ne m'attendais pas à voir de tel résultats en si peu de temps. Je suis ravie de cette découverte, et je regrette de ne pas l'avoir découvert plus tôt, et j'ai hâte de voir ce que va donner l'utilisation de ce produit sur le long terme .\n",,,,,,,,,,,
NatyFabio,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  È da un po’ di tempo che volevo provare prodotti di Paula e ho deciso di farlo con questo esfoliante, Avendo una pelle molto problematica, sopratutto con tendenza acneica. Personalmente per me è stata una grande scoperta. Soldi davvero ben spesi. Già dalle prime applicazioni la pelle appare più luminosa e le macchie si sono notevolmente schiarite. È molto efficace sulle bolle in uscita , le secca subito. Lo applico la mattina e la sera prima della crema con la protezione SPF 50. Ho acquistato anche altri prodotti della linea Clear , specifica per i pori dilatati ed i brufoli.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Anónimo,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  He probado decenas de productos para el cuidado de la piel y este me ha dejado sorprendida. Recibí el producto por la mañana así que me lo apliqué de inmediato, por la noche al aplicarlo de nuevo ya no tenía ni un solo punto negro. Adjunto foto de antes (hoy en la mañana) y después (hoy mismo en la noche). Me encanta porque no lastimo mi piel con la típica exfoliación en la que se usa algún producto en gránulos.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
albano sylvie,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ça fonctionne très bien mes tâches brunes dues à ma grossesse s'effacent je l'utilise 2 fois par jour mais je mets une protection indice 50 car le soleil ne pardonne pas .\n,,,,,,,,,,,
ValentinaCarlotta,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Il miglior esfoliante a base di acido salicilico mai provato.,"La pelle risulta più luminosa già il giorno dopo la prima applicazione. I piccoli brufoletti scompaiono dopo qualche giorno, i punti neri dopo qualche settimana.",La consistenza è quasi oleosa e questo lo rende adatto anche per una pelle sensibile come la mia.\n,,,,,,,,,
Malak,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bottle was smaller than palm of my hand. Be careful it’s only 30 mL\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sukri,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Nach den vielen positiven Bewertungen habe ich Exfoliator einen Versuch gegeben in der Hoffnung meine Poren etwas zu verkleinern und meine Grießkörnchen loszuwerden. Ich habe das Produkt wie beschrieben morgens und Abends angewendet, mich morgens mit einer Creme mit 30er LSF eingrcremt und Abends mit einer Nachtcreme. Nach 4 Wochen Anwendung muss ich sagen: ich sehe keinerlei Veränderung. Dieses Geld hätte ich mir auch sparen können.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Schneider J,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Zu meiner Person:, Mitte 30 mit einer sensiblen trockenen  Haut die zu Unreinheiten  gerade im Kinn gereicht neigt . Um Nase und Wangen Bereich habe ich sehr grosse Poren.,"Bezüglich der Unreinheiten kann ich sagen das ich schon unheimlich viel ausprobiert habe, ein heiden Geld in die Unterschiedlichsten Produkte investiert hatte und kaum ein besseres Ergebnis hatte als wie mit diesem Produkt.  Meine Entzündungen um den Kinn und Mund Bereich verbessern  sich beinahe stetig bzw von Tag zu Tag, ein Ausbrechen kommt schon gar nicht mehr zu Stande nicht einmal mehr Hormonell 1 mal im Monat ;)",Ich nutze es es täglich  morgens und abends mal auf einem Wattepad oder mal Pur ein paar Tropfen in die Handflächen gekippt und dann im Gesicht verteilt nach meiner Gesichtsreinigung.," Es ist scheisse teuer ,darüber brauchen wir nicht diskutieren aber es hilft und da muss ich sagen ist es mir dann das Geld wert. Ich komme mit der 118 mal Flasche genau 1 Monat hin . Und werde mir dieses Produkt wieder bestellen.\n",,,,,,,
Aurora,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Sono delusa dalla dimensione perchè avendo speso 14 euro speravo che la confezione fosse più grande.. invece si trattava di soli 30 ml. Per la qualità però devo dire che funziona, secca un po' la pelle quindi non è adatto a chi ha la pelle sensibile/secca, serve più che altro a chi ha la pelle con tendenza acneica, con macchie, pori dilatati ecc. Tutto sommato la sto usando da qualche settimana e posso dire che ho visto dei miglioramenti.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Gail Clark,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Disappointed at the absolute Ridiculous mark up of salicylic acid, But recently discovered Paula choice is no longer Paula’s actual brand it belongs to beauty Pedia it would’ve been nice to know\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Martine,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Très bon produit je recommande , dommage que je n'avais pas fait attention à la quantité du flacon. Je pensais que c'était la grande bouteille et non la bouteille voyage. J'aimerais beaucoup tester d'autres produits de paula's choice. Comment peut-on avoir des échantillons?\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Roby,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Prodotto molto valido per pelli grasse/acneiche, aiuta a mantenere puliti i pori e a bilanciare la produzione di sebo. La consistenza è perfetta, una volta applicato penetra facilmente e non lascia tracce di unto sulla pelle. Lo applico a giorni alterni solo la sera e mi da ottimi risultati, pelle luminosa, diminuzione delle imperfezioni e del sebo in eccesso. Dopo l'utilizzo è necessario applicare una protezione solare SPF 30 o 50, in quanto l'acido salicilico rende la pelle più sensibile alle radiazioni solari.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Saloni,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  first couple of days made my skin a little worse so I stopped using it twice daily. once I switched to thrice a week, my skin started responding to it. it has helped Clear my skin dramatically.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Samira,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Mi aspettavo un prodotto molto più buono e più efficace.  Sembra un tonico, suggerisco usare per pelli grassi,  io avendo pelle normale /mista e non mi andava bene, anzi mi usciva brufoli e mi iritava,  ma a mio compagno con pelle grassa andava benino.  Per i soldi richiesti il prodotto deve avere al meno una scatola con istruzioni e indicazioni,  invece niente...\n",,,,,,,,,,,
ciaran,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Dieses Produkt hilft wirklich bei Unreinheiten und Entzündungen.  Habe deutlich weniger davon und wenn dann heilen sie viel schneller ab. Meine Haut ist allgemein deutlich ebener seit ich es benutzen. Ich benutze es nach Bedarf. Da ich trockene Haut habe benutze ich im Anschluss ein sehr Feuchtigkeitsspendende Creme.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
michielan nicoletta,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Perfetto per una pulizia profonda della pelle del viso. Si sono drasticamente ridotti i brufoli e i punti neri e i pori non sono più dilatati come prima. Consistenza oleosa adatta alle pelli più secche. Per le pelli sensibili meglio usarlo 1 sola volta al giorno anziché le 2 consigliate.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sophia,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Jeder der sich etwas näher mit Kosmetik befasst, weiß dass man an den Säuren und Peelings nicht vorbeikommt.","Dieses Peeling ist nicht das günstigste, aaaaaber es ist jeden Cent wert, weil ich persönlich bisher kein Peeling gefunden was nach der ersten Anwendung bereits so ein schönes Gefühl gegeben hat.","Ich verwende es sparsam und nicht täglich, aber das Gefühl was es hinterlässt ist perfekt und gerade über Nacht lässt es die Wirkstoffe der nachfolgenden Pflege wesentlich besser einziehen.",Ich habe ein Verbesserung meiner Hautstruktur erkannt (Poren optisch verfeinert und weniger Unreinheiten).\n,,,,,,,,
Stephanie,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ein tolles Produkt. Ich benutze es seit fast einem Monat. Meine Poren sind schon um mind 30% feiner geworden. Auch schuppt meine Haut ab der ersten Anwendung nicht mehr- das tat sie sehr gern im Herbst und Winter.,"In den ersten 2 Wochen hatte ich vereinzelt Pickel, aber das gehört zum Prozeß dazu. Ich wusste es im Vorhinein, da ich mich informiert hatte. LSF ist Pflicht. Ich nutze LSF 50.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Kann ich jedem empfehlen, der mit Mischhaut zu kämpfen hat und schnell durch abgestorbene Hautschüppchen zu unreiner Haut neigt. Es trocknet die Haut nicht aus, ist einfach anzuwenden und auch Irritationen hatte ich nicht. Nach ein paar Tagen schon, ist die Haut wesentlich glatter sauberer und weicher. Auch die Poren verkleinern sich, da das reinigen effektiver wird durch das exfoliate Produkt.",Ein großes Plus ist auch das es sehr ergiebig ist. Preis Leistung passt dadurch auch.,Ich benutze nie wieder was anderes.,Das Paket kam sehr schnell und gut verpackt.\n,,,,,,,,
Sarah090,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich finde, das Hautbild ist vor allem optisch ein reineres. Ich glänze zwar irgendwie davon, aber das verschwindet mit ein bisschen Foundation auch. Die Haut bekommt einen gewissen glow und wirkt glatt. Geruch erinnert bisschen an Essig, aber ist ja auch Säure.",Ich kann das Produkt empfehlen.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Eva K.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Perfekte Vorbereitung zum Microneedling oder einfach zur täglichen Pflege der Haut. Ich habe eine sehr empfindliche Mischhaut, kann das Produkt also nicht morgens und Abends verwenden. Aber Abends als Reinigung und anschließend eine intensive Nachtpflege ist die perfekte Kombination und hat mir geholfen ein reineres Hautbild zu bekommen!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
mia,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich benutze es Zeit meinem Monat jetzt. Habe Mischhaut und benutze es nur auf den Stellen wo es nötig ist mehr oder weniger einmal in der Woche.  Ich vertrage es sehr gut und habe schon drastische Ergebnisse. Habe davor ein Allergietest am Handgelenk gemacht. Sicher ist sicher. Jetzt im Winter trage ich nur am darauffolgenden Tag einen Sonnenschutz auf. Das kleine Fläschchen wird mir noch länger halten da ich es nur in der t-zone auftrage. Ich habe ich Hauptsächlich wegen der Salicyl-Säure  gekauft und da keine weiteren Zusätze drin sind die unnötig reizten.,Also für mich ist das Preis-leistungsverhältnis Top und gerechtfertigt.  Natürlich muss ich beobachten wie sich die Bedürfnisse meine Haut verändern über das Jahr aber bis jetzt bin ich zuversichtlich.\n,,,,,,,,,,
S. M.,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  benutze es entweder nach AHA oder allein abends vor einem Serum und der Nachtcreme(oder Aloe Vera Gel) Verträglichkeit ist gut, keine Hautschuppen bisher. Den Langzeiteffekt muss man abwarten, benutze es erst ein paar Tage. Erhoffe mir einen Rückgang meiner Akne.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cleo Patra,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  habe es in der kleinen Reisengröße bestellt, da ich es erst mal ausprobieren wollte. bisher kann ich sagen, dass es einfach in der Anwendung ist. ich verwende es für den Anfang nur 1x pro Woche. Bei meiner zu Unreinheiten neigenden Mischhaut hat es bereits nach der 2. Anwendung augenscheinlich die Rötungen im Gesicht gemildert. Ich bin bisher zufrieden, der Langzeit wird zeigen ob ich damit endlich meine Unreinheiten in den Griff bekomme.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Hat meine Haut komplett verändert! Preis klar teurer aber ich hatte immer sehr starke Probleme mit meiner Haut und nichts hat so geholfen wie das! Aber bitte am Anfang nicht täglich verwenden das kann nämlich Irritationen hervorrufen! Man sollte langsam anfangen. UND immer eine Sonnencreme benutzen (wenn man rausgeht) wenn man das benutzt!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Silvia Müller,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich habe es jetzt für eine Weile regelmäßig benutzt und ich muss sagen, mein Hautbild hat sich nicht wirklich geändert, ich sehe und spüre auch keine großartige Verbesserung, die die Werbung verspricht. Ich würde es nicht unbedingt weiterempfehlen.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Hylian.na,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bei mir hat das Gesicht nach der Anwendung angefangen zu kribbeln und leicht zu brennen. Zudem hatte ich einen leicht öligen Film auf der Haut. Ich weiß nicht ob das so sein soll oder nicht, jedenfalls hat mich das Produkt nicht wirklich überzeugt.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Andrea Michel,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Grundsätzlich verträgt meine trockene Haut eigentlich alles. Auf dieses Produkt habe ich hochallergisch reagiert. Die komplette Stirn war knallrot und hatte kleine Wasserbläschen.,"Über 3 Tage dauerte es, bis sich meine Haut einigermaßen erholt hat.",Keine Kaufempfehlung\n,,,,,,,,,
Sven Siebenschuh,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich bin Ü 40 und hatte durch Akne viele rote, „Narben“ an Stirn und Schläfe. Ich benutze diesen Artikel seit 4 Wochen 1x am Tag und meine Haut hat sich merklich gebessert. Auch wird die Haut hierdurch sehr weich und fühlt sich sauber an. Von daher kann ich diesen Artikel bis dato sehr empfehlen und werde ihn erneut kaufen.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich habe noch nie so schnell eine so gute Haut bekommen. Es macht die Haut etwas trocken und man hat dann Hautschuppen, die man aber gut durch ein körniges Peeling oder einen Microfaserlappen gut runter bekommt. Ich war noch nie so zufrieden und ich habe schon soooo viel ausprobiert. Ich habe empfindliche Haut und komme trotzdem gut zurecht.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Elena We,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich neige sehr zu kleineren Unreinheiten / Pickeln im Dekolletee und auf der Stirn.,Diese sind durch das Peeling alle so gut wie verschwunden!,"Ich verwende es mittlerweile jeden Abend, da ist es auf Dauer vielleicht schon ein bisschen teuer.",Nur mit unterirdischen Pickeln am Kinn hab ich noch zu kämpfen... Aber schaden tut dieses BHA Peeling denen auch nicht.,Kann es deshalb nur weiterempfehlen!\n,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Non è sgradevole, anzi lascia la pelle morbida, ma l'ho preso perché era indisponibile un altro prodotto acquistato in precedenza e, questo qui - al confronto - mi è parso troppo blando.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Hanna Pfennings,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich habe schon viel von den Produkten von paulas choice gehört und war gespannt als ich dieses bestellt Habe. Leider wurden meine Erwartungen nicht getroffen. Ich sehe in meiner haur keinen Unterschied und einen physical exfoliator brauche ich trotzdem. Meine Akne ist sogar eigentlich Schlimmer geworden. Das muss nicht an diesel pwwlinf liegen nur hat es auch nichts positives gegen diese akne Ausbrüche getan.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
KaMü,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich habe das Peeling jetzt in meine Pflegeroutine aufgenommen. Zu Beginn kann es sinnvoll sein, das Exfoliant nur jeden 2. Tag aufzutragen (auf gereinigter und ggf. geklärter Haut) und anschließend immer eine feuchtigkeisspendende Tages- (mit LSF) oder Natchtcreme verwenden.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Yumi,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich werde es immer wieder kaufen das Produkt ist das Geld wert.,Haut wird lupenrein und super feinporig pickel setzen sich nicht mehr durch. Seit ich diese Produktlinie nutze hatte ich nie wieder akute Probleme mit meiner haut\n,,,,,,,,,,
Andrea Gertz,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich war erst positiv angetan, da die Haut wirklich klarer und die Poren feiner wurden. Nach 4 Wochen bekam ich tiefsitzende, schmerzhafte Beulen im Gesicht, Hals, Dekolleté. Ich dachte an eine Erstverschlimmerung. Nach weiteren 2 Wochen habe ich das Mittel abgesetzt und jetzt schlimme Pickelmale und Gnubbel unter der Haut.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Das einzige Produkt mit dem meine Haut besser wurde. Habe nach dem Absetzen der Pille extrem schlechte Haut bekommen. Leider trocknet es die Haut sehr aus und der Preis ist wirklich übertrieben für so eine kleine Flasche.. dennoch bin ich zufrieden und werde es weiterhin kaufen und kann es empfehlen.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
MaBo,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich habe lange überlegt, dieses Produkt zu kaufen da der Preis mich etwas abgeschreckt hat.",Ich bin von der Wirkung sehr begeistert. Ich trage es morgens und abends auf mein Gesicht auf oder auch mal mehrmals auf vereinzelte Stellen. Meine Haut ist allgemein viel reiner und klarer geworden. Dafür zahle ich gerne den Preis.\n,,,,,,,,,,
louis martin,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Thus is a ridiculous size for price paid. Not easy to open especially under the shower. similar quality products for way cheaper.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Célia,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Excellent produit, comme la plus part des produits de cette marque. Il est conseillé de l’utiliser de préférence le soir ou en journée mais avec une bonne protection solaire car produit photo-sensibilisant. Si comme moi vous avez une peau sensible et très réactive, je vous conseille de faire du zoning (traitement de zones les moins sensibles). Mon mari et moi utilisons cette lotion après la douche pour traiter nos nez. Elle élimine bien les peaux mortes et ressert les pores.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Valentina,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Il prodotto è ottimo contro l'acne però penso che la confezione dovrebbe essere modificata in modo da poter immergere un pennello per evitare sprechi. Imbevendo il cotone si consumano grandi quantitativi e il prodotto da 30 ml mi è durato 10 giorni risultando così  troppo costoso.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Gitah,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Das Produkt ist sehr gut , mein Hautbild hat sich verbessert , jedoch ist  der Preis etwas zu hoch\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Prinzessin,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Wirkungsvoll, reduziert Pickel und Mitesser und der Preis ist für die Wirkung angemessen! Bin komplett zufrieden und habe es nachgekauft.. Haut reinigen und danach das Liquid in die Hände geben und Gesicht einreiben.. an den Sonnenschutz denken, da die Haut nach dem Peeling empfindlich ist!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Floriana Piscitelli,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Il prodotto corrisponde alla descrizione, con uso regolare (ogni sera) migliora notevolmente l'aspetto della pelle. Ne basta poco quindi dura a lungo\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Habe mir das Produkt in kleiner Größe zum Probieren bestellt, da ich sehr empfindliche Haut habe. Nach kurzer Anwendung sah man bereits die ersten Ergebnisse, meine Haut war klarer und mein Hautbild wurde feiner. Allerdings habe ich nach ca. 1 Woche Anwendung so trockene Haut bekommen, sodass ich das Produkt leider bisher nicht mehr verwenden konnte.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Rubi Cisneros Milla,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  desde la pagina web de paula's choice España, me salia mas caro con los gastos de envio, asi que compré por aqui la minitalla para probarlo y la verdad es que me ha gustado mucho.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Client d'Amazon,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Très bon produit mais faire attention à l’application car peut dessécher la peau si utiliser trop intensément !\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cynthia Wang,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This person use enlarged the picture to make it look like regular size. This is NOT regular size, this is super small Tavel size. Don’t buy!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Rebecca,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product is tiny for the price. A complete rip off and is basically a sample size.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Louise B.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Mittlerweile mein zweiter Kauf dieses Produkts und ich werde es wieder und wieder kaufen.,Ich benutze es abends nach der Gesichtsreinigung und meine Haut ist schon nach der ersten Anwendung sichtbar strahlender geworden. Eine Flasche reicht etwas mehr als ein halbes Jahr\n,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Angenehm nach dem auftragen, kein Austrocknungsgefühl.","Leider wirkt es bei mir nicht so gut, kleinere Pickel verschwinden, sind aber nach 2 Tagen wieder da.",Stärkere Hautunreinheiten verschwinden garnicht.\n,,,,,,,,,
November Rain,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I used it seeing positive reviews but I couldn’t find the answers I was looking for so I wrote them in Instagram but seems not friendly nor I’m noticing any changes so far 👎\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Miriana,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Lo uso da una settimana e già tutti i segni e macchie post acne stanno sparendo, sono veramente stupita da questo prodotto. Ho abbinato anche un sapone al sale marino\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Lila28,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Tatsächlich das einzige was mir bis jetzt wirklich geholfen hat, Preis ist natürlich ordentlich hoch\n",,,,,,,,,,,
SuLa,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Leider wurde meine Haut damit nicht besser.,Teuer und keine Wirkung selbst nach mehreren Wochen.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Daniela Bäßler,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Taugt nichts und zu gehypt\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Lola,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bestes Produkt! Nicht günstig aber effektiv wenn man es langfristig anwendet. Mein Hautbild hat sich auf jeden Fall verbessert und bekomme selten Pickel oder Unreinheiten. Kaufe es wieder.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Celina Ponte,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  After using this product for a week every night, I rarely have any new breakouts. Usually I have a least 1 or 2 active areas but now I only have the scars from old problem areas. Hopefully after using this product for a while I can have a more clear face.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
daniela9488b,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Five weeks using this and did absolutely nothing for my skin. Clogged pores, sebaceous filaments and pimples galore as usual.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
k.Mai,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  der Preis ist schon teuer, geht es bei mir weder schlecht noch gut, keine Änderung\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I was sent a SAMPLE SIZE of this. I spend 32 dollars on a 1oz bottle. This is supposed to be 10oz.  Ridiculous.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Silvia,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I am already using it for couple of months and it really works! My inflammation is reduced and the pores are visibly smaller. Also, my oil production is reduced and my make up wears better and last longer. I am very happy with the product! Definitely will repurchase!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ottimo prodotto! Sto usando per l’ultima 2 settimana ogni mattina e devo dire ho un ‘glow’.,This is a great product and I can’t believe such good results in less than 2 weeks.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Willi Peters,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Gefällt mir, brauche ich, will ich nicht mehr missen....\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Flávia Regina Almeida da silva,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Paula‘s Choice is My Choice immer!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
sabrina kipping,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Viel zu teuer, zu wenig fürs Geld\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Julesssss,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Misleading this is travel sized\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Lunarity,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich bin nicht überzeugt.  Nach einigen Anwendungen habe ich keine Veränderung gesehen - habe es hauptsächlich gegen meine Pickel benutzt.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Nicole,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Absultly love this product. Totally took away all my hormonal acne!!!!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Anzei,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Peeling allerdings als Flüssigkeit zum Auftragen. Ich bin begeistert und kann es nur weiter empfehlen. Allerdings hat das Produkt auch seinen Preis.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sarah H.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich benutze das Produkt seit ca 3 Wochen. Meine Akne auf dem Rücken ist zu 90% weg gegangen. Ich trage es morgens auf Gesicht und Rücken auf. Ich bin super zufrieden und begeistert. Leider ist das Produkt nicht so günstig.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Marta Naranjo,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Me ha encantado. Repetiré\n,,,,,,,,,,,
detroit,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Paid almost $50 for this & it is so small!!! Won’t be buying again. Do not buy this!!! Scam!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
alessandra andreis,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ho aspettato a recensire per testare il prodotto. Davvero ottimo!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
123,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Was skeptical because if didn’t have a seal on. Used it once at bed time and started noticing results after 2 weeks of use. Still using it every night and forehead is clear.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Emilie,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  the bottle is overpriced for what it does, didn’t work for me unfortunately.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Susan Mcdonald,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Super small and leaked it the box. Total waste of time and money\n,,,,,,,,,,,
kunthika n,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Since the Ordinary stop their line of 2% Acid, I have tried this one instead. It works the same way, only that the product feel a little more oily which is overall fine.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Talitha,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I payed 40$ for a bottle the height of my middle finger!!! That is a total scam\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jijiana,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bonjour, j'utilise le produit en complément pour éviter les imperfections. Le  format voyage était pour voir si je tolère le produit. Ce format et intéressant. Mais excessivement cher à mon sens. Est j'ai perdu le petit bouchon des le premier jour, trop dur à ouvrir. Quand au résultat, il est toujours à l'essai.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Vildan Altin,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Das Produkt hat mir sehr geholfen mein Hautbild zu verbessern. Ich muss nur drauf achten es etwas sparsamer zu verwenden, da die Wattepads weil Produkt aufsaugen.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Pseudonym,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich mag es sehr und sah schon nach einer Woche eine Verbesserung\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kerui Yao,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Misleading description. Product returned upon delivery.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Punitka,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Expensive but well worth the buy!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
cristina ghislandi,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Era quello che mi aspettavo, tonico esfoliante da utilizzare dopo pulizia con un batuffolo senza dover risciacquo\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Tomasz ,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  ok\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Claudia Chima-Klaas,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Sehr gutes,chemisches peeling.Teuer,aber effektiv\n",,,,,,,,,,,
beatrice,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellente lotion pour prévenir l'apparition des boutons et point noirs\n,,,,,,,,,,,
nav,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Works great! Has really helped clear up my acne. Only con is that it’s pretty expensive for so little product 🙃\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ha Phuong,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Perfect use for acne treatment, even for dry sensitive skin. The results are actually visible after 2-3 times usage. But don’t forget to use SPF after.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
VINCENT Brice,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Deuxième fois que je le prend.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Buschra,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Echt unormal gut habe es mir wegen @xskincare geholt und bin begeistert\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mur,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Paid way too much for this small little bottle.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Elisa Neuhausen,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Mega toles Produkt. Hat mir wirklich sehr geholfen. Hatte sehr unreine Haut, viele kleine Pickel, vor allem auf der Stirn.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Kalpa,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It really reduces pimples and open pores.my skin looks healthy\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Christina,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich benutze es seit 3 Wochen alle zwei Tage und habe deutlich weniger/kleinere Pickel bzw. Unreinheiten. Tolles Produkt.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cinzia,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  mi è piaciuto tantissimo il prodotto, molto utile per la pelle che abbia acne.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Magdalena,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Dieses Produkt ist wirklich super! Hat meine Haut deutlich verbessert. Absolut Empfehlenswert.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mira Arnold,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Perfect um sein Hautbild zu verbessern\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Dominique Kiefer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Nach 2 Wochen ist meine Haut schon viel besser!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cristina,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Gratamente sorprendida! El precio elevado pero merece la pena\n,,,,,,,,,,,
SONIA TARTAGLIONE,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ottimo prodotto. Sta aiutando a risolvere l'acne cistica di cui è affetto mio figlio\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kindle-Kundin,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich bin total begeistert. Gegen meine Hautunreinheiten habe ich schon alles ausprobiert und endlich ein wirksames Produkt gefunden.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Marlies Paulsen,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Dosierhilfe  Beziehungsweise: Pipette oder Pumpspray wäre besser es geht viel daneben\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Evgeniia,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich bin zufrieden\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cecile lai,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Je viens juste de le recevoir et pas encore commencé à l’utiliser, par contre je suis très déçue, car la date de fabrication est février 2016, c’est fabriqué il y a plus de 4 ans et c’est ça qu’on m’a vendu?!!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Pulisce bene la pelle , la rigenera! Consigliato\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ich empfehle es weiter! Sehr positiv überrascht! Meine Haut sieht frisch aus und ganz sauber.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Elisabetta Merlo,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Prodotto che ha soddisfatto le aspettative\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Antal Gergo,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  After two weeks of using this product, I simply like it.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Client d'Amazon,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Très bon exfolliant les pores sont resserré et la peau paraît plus fraîche. Je l applique le soir sur un coton et après j applique ma crème de nuit\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Djabar,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Très petit le flacon pour 15€\n,,,,,,,,,,,
giacomina,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  buon prodotto\n,,,,,,,,,,,
benedetta,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Poche parole: mai più senza!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kateryna Gelashvili,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  best treatment for blackheads that i found so far\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Shavarin,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Sehr schnelle Lieferung und ein tolles Produkt, kann ich weiterempfehlen\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Client d'Amazon,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Fonctionne mais alors déçue par la quantité !\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Dezember,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Deutlich verbessertes Haubild. Keine Hautirritationen.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Maria B,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Hält was es verspricht. Neue Flasche ist schon bestellt.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Client d'Amazon,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bon produit et fait parti de ma routine.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Daphne,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bon produit, efficace mais cher. Le format 30 ml est bien petit.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Mehirban Inan Miran ,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Super Produkt\n,,,,,,,,,,,
rance,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  A voir sur long terme flacon petit on dirait un echantillon\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Julia Timm,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Funktioniert für mich gut\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Laura Perrucci,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Meraviglioso\n,,,,,,,,,,,
yut856,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  good\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Nadia ,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  J'utilise ce produit pour point noir pore dilaté et ride Je constate en peu de temps une amélioration sur ma peau Mais encore trop tôt pour en parler\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Super!!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Francoise B.,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  j'ai acheté ce produit pour réduire la visibilité des pores et retirer les points noirs.,"Je n'ai pas vu de différences de ce côté là cependant, pour les personnes à imperfection (petit boutons pas cool) je le conseille fortement !\n",,,,,,,,,,
Je suis a mon  second flacon de proto-col et j'ai remarqué que mes cheveux et tu es beaucoup plus beau il pousse plus vite aussi et mon visage plus lumineux j'ai aussi les ongles qui poussent beaucoup plus vite je continue cette cure et je vous la recommande fortement,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Produit efficace sur les points noir, resserre les pores. Dommage le flacon est très petit.",Je recommande ce produit aux personnes qui ont la peau grasse.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Uvalle Laurent,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Cher pour la quantité de 30 ml\n,,,,,,,,,,,
lilie45,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  simplement parfait mes taches d'acné se sont nettement atténuer\n,,,,,,,,,,,
b,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Bon produit, agréable , mais terriblement cher pour un aussi petit contenant\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Client d'Amazon,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Très bon produit, une peau lumineuse avec beaucoup moins de point noir\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Guez,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Pas conforme à la photo\n,,,,,,,,,,,
María Grx,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Este producto se lo he dejado a mi hija para que lo pruebe y comente los resultados, ya que tiene la piel mixta. Se trata de un líquido transparente y sin perfume que se aplica echando el producto en un disco del algodón. Se absorbe casi al instante y de momento, en unos días que llevo usándolo no he notado la piel irritada, ni tirante, si bien, solo me lo he aplicado en la nariz y en la barbilla, que son las zonas donde tengo los poros abiertos y se me queda más grasa. La piel se queda mate y lisa, pero todavía es pronto para ver si consigue mejorar los poros abiertos.","El ácido salicílico es un principio activo contra las causas de la piel grasa con tendencia acnéica: la obstrucción de los poros y el crecimiento bacteriano. Es un betahidroxiácido, que actúa como queratolítico de la piel (elimina las células muertas de la piel y suaviza la piel para evitar el bloqueo de los poros), y es comedolítico, es decir, que abre los poros obstruidos. En general, mejora el aspecto de la piel: reduce las imperfecciones y previene que se formen otras nuevas. Tiene una fecha de caducidad de 12 meses después de abierto y el bote viene precintado.","Hace un tiempo sí he utilizado productos con ácido salicílico y ácido glicólico, y sobre todo al principio, a veces notaba que eran algo agresivos, aunque la concentración que llevaban eran mayor que en este líquido exfoliante. Aún así, como existe una posibilidad de que la piel se seque o se irrite al comenzar el tratamiento, se puede aplicar con poca frecuencia al principio y aumentarla gradualmente conforme la piel se acostumbre. También se indica sobre este compuesto, que pueden pasar varias semanas, o más, antes de que notemos los beneficios totales del mismo e incluso que existe una probabilidad de que nuestro problema empeore durante los primeros días de tratamiento mientras la piel se adapta.","A pesar de que la composición de este exfoliante es más suave y dice que lo podemos aplicar en todo el rostro, incluido el contorno de los ojos (evitando la línea inferior de las pestañas y los párpados), yo la verdad que lo evitaría porque me parece que sigue siendo un ingrediente fuerte y tampoco veo necesario aplicarlo en la zona del contorno. De hecho, creo que es la primera vez que veo que indiquen que un exfoliante se utilice en esa parte de la cara.","Los ingredientes que lleva son: Aqua, Methylpropanediol (hydration), Butylene Glycol (hydration), Salicylic Acid (Beta Hydroxy Acid, exfoliant), Polysorbate 20 (stabilizer), Camellia Oleifera (Green Tea) Leaf Extract (skin calming/antioxidant), Sodium Hydroxide (pH balancer), Tetrasodium EDTA (stabilizer).\n",,,,,,,
Atlantic Star,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Bottiglia da 118ml di prodotto. All'interno è una soluzione trasparente e inodore con una consistenza leggermente oleosa.,Andrebbe applicato su viso e collo 2 volte al giorno con un dischetto di cotone.,Non risciacquare. Prodotto adatto a tutti i tipi di pelle.,"Questo liquido trasparente contiene il 2% di acido salicilico (BHA), effettua un'esfoliazione efficace dei pori e riduce significativamente la comparsa di punti neri e du brufoli. Contiene sostanze per lenire la pelle.","La texure è liquida (come tonico) ed è ottimo per pelli grasse e miste. Rimuove lo strato superficiale della pelle e penetra in profondità nei pori ostruiti. Ha un pH 3.2 che è ottimale per l'esfoliazione, non ha profumo.","CONSIGLIO: in caso di utilizzo di prodotti contenenti BHA, durante il giorno è assolutamente necessario applicare una crema con fattore di protezione. I soggetti allergici all'aspirina (acetylsalicylate) non dovrebbero usare prodotti contenenti acido salicilico (BHA).",L’acido salicilico (BHA) penetra in profondità nei pori dove scioglie il sebo prevenendo così l’insorgere di brufoli e punti neri.,RISULTATI,"La grana della pelle è levigata, i pori ristretti e i brufoletti sono scomparsi, i risultati sono evidenti già dopo un breve periodo di utilizzo le impurità sono quasi sparite, la pelle sembra molto più liscia e pulita.\n",,,
Rainbow,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Se trata de Paula's Choice Skin Perfecting Liquido Exfoliante 2% de BHA - Peeling Facial Combate Espinillas & los Puntos Negros - Limpia Poros - con Ácido Salicílico - Piel Mixta a Grasa - 118 ml.,Es un exfoliante suave. Lo llevo usando solo unos dias pero por ahora va perfecto.,Lo aplico a dias alternos con un disco de algodón sobre la piel de la cara y lo retiro con agua tibia.,La piel se ve mas limpia y libre de impurezas.,"Si necesitais un exfoliante de este tipo, este puede ser una muy buena opción de compra, al menos a mi me lo parece, ya sabeis que luego cada piel es un mundo.\n",,,,,,,
Nouchka,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Cet exfolient est idéal pour réguler l'excès de sébum de ma peau mixte à tendance grasse !,"Une 1ère application un peu délicate, avec des picotements et quelques petits endroits du visage où ma peau a pelée .....","Mais apparemment, il faut laisser un peu de temps à la peau pour qu'elle s'habitue au soin à base d'acide salicylique.","Je suis contente de constater, après 5 ou 6 jours d'utilisation que mon teint est beaucoup plus lumineux mais aussi que les plus petites imperfections comme les petits points noirs s'assèchent et mes pores sont beaucoup moins dilatés.","Attention, ce soin est assez agressif et malgré ma peau mixte, je suis contrainte de réhydrater ma peau après chacune de ses utilisations .....","En fait, c'est un soin qui nettoie, purifie et pénètre en profondeur .... D'où l'impression d'une peau hyper bien nettoyée !","1 étoile en moins à ma note globale, à cause de la présence dans ses ingrédients du Polysorbate 20, qui se trouve être un ingrédient issu de la pétrochimie (Rrrrr) donc néfaste pour la Nature .....","En résumé : un soin qui porte bien son nom ""exfoliat"" et que j'ai décidé d'utiliser en cure régulière car très décapant pour la peau pour l'utiliser chaque jour, à mon avis !\n",,,,
Hélène,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Excellent produit, de la marque Paula’s Choice.","Cependant, si on suit les conseils d’utilisation, c’est une ou deux fois par jour. Ça, ça me paraît excessif. Je pense qu’une fois tous les deux jours, c’est largement suffisant.","En effet c’est un produit qui décape assez bien la peau, tout en la laissant hyper douce et bien nette. Je suis ravie du résultat obtenu, Mais au début, j’ai suivi les instructions et mon nez a commencé à peler, j’ai dû diminuer la fréquence.","D’autre part, je pense qu’il est vraiment préférable de l’utiliser le soir, la peau restant un peu grasse, pendant la durée  d’absorption.",Peut-être aussi que tout ça dépend de la peau de chacun. Donc à adapter à sa propre carnation.,"Quoi qu’il en soit, le résultat est très positif.\n",,,,,,
julia,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I got the small bottle to test it out. Definitely buying a bigger one in the future.,Pros:,A. It really made my skin softer. I applied before bed and could feel the effects in the morning,"B. It shrinks your pores, decreasing acne",Concerns:,A. Its expensive for a big bottle. I'd try a small bottle at first to see if you like it,"B. its comes fast so it's easy to use more than you want. To combat this, I'd apply with fingers instead of a cotton pad. The cotton absorbs it fast so you'll be wasting product.\n",,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Holy s***!!! I don't know what just happened but I have literally NEVER been this impressed with the way my skin looks or feels immediately after trying a skin care product for the first time. I am obviously not talking long term results here but my skin is glowing beyond belief, feels clean, fresh and looks AMAZEBALLS!!! Will try to remember and update at the end of the trial sized bottle I purchased to try out before buying the full sized bottle.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Felicitas Martinez,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Love this product. Have already purchased twice. I could actually see improvement in the size of my pores, redness around my nose and dullness. Mind you, I do follow a very strict skincare routine, but I think that I will stick to this product for a while. I used it after cleaner, toner, then this Paula product, followed by my nighttime serum and my vitamin A (Retinol) cream for face and the neck and decollatage cream as well. My husband has noticed the improvement as well. If you are hesitant, you can always try buying the traveling size bottle as well. That's what I did and then I got hooked. Also, I only use it at night, so if you planning on using it twice a day you might even see results faster. Y personally do not like to use any time of chemical peeling product during the day (even though I religiously use SPF 40/50  during the day), specifically now that the sun feels much stronger during summer. Get it! It won't disappoint!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
aheb,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I got this to try and help my skin with a few issues. I had breakouts, a few scars, big pores that looked like my skin was dirty, and some Melasma on my upper lip from pregnancy. I have been using it every other day at night time for a week and have noticed a big difference in my skin already! My acne cleared up, my scar already has reduced in visibility as has my Melasma, and my skin just looks and feels so much better. I would definitely recommend for any of the things I listed. I have sensitive skin too and had no issues. You can feel it is acidic though so I follow up with a good moisturizer afterwards as well. Worth the buy!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
laffer14,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was skeptical at first...but this stuff is AMAZING. I have struggled for years and years with acne on my forehead that looks like tiny little skin-colored bumps, and nothing worked even a little to clear it up until this.  I noticed a significant change within a week but waited about a month until I could finally believe that it wasn’t a crazy coincidence how well my skin cleared up. I just swipe it on with a cotton ball before I go to bed each night, and that has worked for me. I usually have very dry, sensitive skin, but this hasn’t really made it any drier than usual or anything. I would absolutely recommend!! I bought the 1 oz size just to test it out, but will obviously be buying the full size from now on. Very happy with this product!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
dw,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  im leaving a review on jan. 6, 2020 and ill update it in about a month as i have only used it once so far.","after reading the amazing reviews i decided to give it a try. i got the 30 ml or 1 fl. oz size since i wasnt sure if i was going to love it, so i played it safe with the small size. its about the size of a gluestick in height and thickness, and i think if you dont use too much at a time, this small amount could last a long time. there was no leaking or damage, and theres a stopper plug after you take off the cap so theres no spilling if you fasten it tight. the bottle, although small, feels like a luxury item because of the nice feel of the packaging. the bottle is recyclable and the product is cruelty free :)","my experience was pretty good! i have very sensitive skin that is prone to redness and irritation if i dont use gentle products. i double cleansed and toned as normal, then used this product and left it for about 20 minutes. i read online that its best to leave BHA products by themselves for a while to allow them to fully soak into the skin before continuing with your skincare routine.  i didnt notice any dryness or dry feeling throughout those 20 minutes which is a huge plus as my skin starts to feel dry quickly if i dont use my moisturizing products right after cleansing. also i use this at night since apparently BHA makes your skin sensitive to the sunlight. the next morning when i woke up, i definitely noticed a change. i have those weird bumps on my forehead thats not really acne and never goes away, and the next morning they looked smaller. i also have red scarring from past breakouts on both my cheeks, and they looked less red. it didnt work a miracle overnight, but it gave me a good feeling about repeated use.","the bottle directions say to apply once or twice daily, which i personally feel is a little overkill for a exfoliant and may throw my skin out of balance. so im going to just use it every 2 days or so at night (to minimize risk of sun damage)  and come back in a month to share my results. i gave it four stars for now so that if it works well i can come back and give it 5 stars! see you on the 6th of february","UPDATE: It's now the 6th of Feb., and I did switch around my usage. I used every two days, then I used it every day, but now I'm using it every other day. It did start to make my skin feel a little dry while waiting for the 20 minutes, so i decided to cut it down to 10 minutes, and again to 8 minutes and that seemed like a better time for my skin. It didn't cause any redness or new breakouts, and it has definitely helped with my scars, but I wouldn't go as far as to say it's a miracle product or it changed my skin around. I think a couple more months of steady usage will really show drastic results. All in all, I'm happy with it and will continue to use it. Again, I think this product works, it may just take more than a month to really see good results. 'v'\n",,,,,,,
Michael Caibio,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Overall verdict: yes, I recommend it! I wish it were not so expensive, though. I worked it into my night-time regimen, after removing my makeup (I’m a girl—“Michael” is my brother, and we share this account) because doing this in the AM would probably leave you with a residue on your face for a few hours. Doing it at night, though, I don’t touch my face and wake up with that sticky feeling gone. I use it maybe twice a week.","Cons: even though I really like this stuff, the reasons why I knocked it down a star are that it’s kind of expensive for how much is in the little bottle, I can’t touch my face after for a few hours and it tastes bad when it gets on my lips.","Pros: it really works—my skin is definitely more evenly toned (idk about luminous, but it looks great to me), I don’t break out with it, and it’s so much faster/easier than my old in-shower exfoliation process. You can feel it working—I rub it on with a cotton round, maybe one or two swipes per area and it tingles for a bit after. Looking at the round, you can see it does triple-duty as a cleanser, as well as an exfoliate/toner.\n",,,,,,,,,
Jen,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  After using this product 3 times my face broke out in hives. It was itching and burning so I washed it off after 15 mins every time. I was really trying to love it bc of the great reviews but apparently my skin is super sensitive to almost everything i put on my face. I didnt use very much of the product either. Put a small amount on a cosmetic round. I'm also not using any other face products. I cant use multiple skin care products at the same time. I have mostly dry skin and comedones and a bit of cystic acne on the chin. I didnt see any reviews about itching or burning so I figured I'd leave one. Hopefully this helps someone else with super sensitive skin.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
J. Frazier,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was hesitant about using this because of the reviews on it being sticky to touch & gave some people oily skin. I have old skin at 66yo that’s oily, really oily. I tried it last nite for the first time. Slight tingling or stinging but I don’t have sensitive skin. As for the stickiness it’s sticky all right but you have to let it dry completely. I use it before bed but I let it dry for an hour while reading & the stickiness was gone. When I washed my face this morning it wasn’t oily at all. My skin felt unbelievable soft & hydrated. I use the Paula’s choice toner first. I’m not consistent with skin care but I might be after using this. Felt and saw results after one use. Took one star off for price. I started with the trial size.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Justin,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product DEFINITELY does its job. It isn’t moisturizing or anything, it actually dries out my skin quite a bit, but it is fantastic at removing blackheads and minimizing pores. I have been applying it directly to my skin for about 3 weeks and there has definitely been a visible change in my pore size. I wish I had taken before and after pictures.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Tara Smith,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Let me just tell you. Right now. If you are debating getting this. GET IT! Just buy the travel size first like I did and realize that you have been missing out on this heavenly product for all this time!,"I moved to TX from the Midwest. I never had pimples or issues with my skin until exposing myself to this humidity. I have been breaking out since I moved here 5 yrs ago and have tried EVERYTHING. This is the first thing (besides the product I was getting from my derm that worked - but cost me over 150 dollars) that has made a change to my skin IN LESS THAN A WEEK! My acne scars are diminishing as I write this review. I’ll come and do a follow up, but I have been only using this product since I received it 4 days ago and I can already feel and see a difference! Less oil! No pimples! All the ones that were coming have stopped. My skin is soooo smooth and my makeup applies so much better (I’m on my husbands amazon but I’m a 29 year old woman using this product). I really can tell such a difference! Also note I am biracial so i scar from acne super easily and this has been a miracle in just 4 days\n",,,,,,,,,,
Lx,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  During and after my pregnancy my skin totally changed. I had blotches of red on my face, bad acne, deep blackheads, and uneven skin tone. I was skeptical that anything could help get my skin back to its former glory.","I bought the 1oz. trial size and overnight the blotches were gone! My acne was significantly reduced and the blackheads seemed to come to the surface of my skin for extraction. Coupled with a salicylic acid solution, my acne is virtually gone and under control. I have a few blemishes but *nothing* like I once had.","When I applied makeup, I used a quarter of what I used to use and it went on smooth and brought out my natural glow instead of covering it up.","The only con is how this product dried out my skin. But if it didn't dry out my skin, my acne would still be there and the product would be a waste of money.\n",,,,,,,,
Andrew,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I tried to like this product, but ultimately ended up sending it back for a refund.  The smell isn't strong but the scent that is there is less than pleasant.  It felt eternally greasy on my skin and never fully absorbed.  Worst of all, it caused my cheeks to break out in painful, red pimples (somewhere I never, EVER break out!).  At first I thought this reaction might be a purge, but I went with my gut and quit using the product after only a week.  As soon as I stopped, the cheek acne began to clear and eventually disappeared.  (Note: I have not changed anything else in my skin care routine for the last few months so I am sure this product was the culprit of my breakout). I did notice the product helping ever so slightly with the tiny skin colored bumps on my forehead, but ultimately decided painful acne somewhere else wasn't worth it.  Because this product has such a large following, I was really hoping it would become my BHA of choice! Sadly it didn't work out.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
HollyM,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I used this on my face first. It took a little while to dry but afterward my usually bumpy skin was so so soft. So I decided to try it on my bumpy arms caused by keratosis pilaris. HOLY MOLY it made my arms smooth too!!! Seriously just after ONE application of using this my skin is so much smoother. I feel like I’ve found a miracle product. Also, this is probably the longest review I’ve written. This is by far the best product I’ve EVER found!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Natali,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This is a great product! I use in conjunction with Thayer's Witch Hazel. I used to only use the Witch Hazel before but boy when I used this product for the first time I saw how much GUNK I was missing. The smell can be likened to nail polish remover which is why I follow my regimen with the Witch Hazel which smells much better.,This is the first product I've used that has effectively gotten rid of those lil white dots I get on my chin. I thought they were stubborn white heads but they're much tougher.,Long story short-- this product rules! Give it a shot. I tried the sample before buying the big bottle I suggest you do the same!!\n,,,,,,,,,
Paul A Greyson,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This is my favorite skincare product. I had these little black dots on my nose that I originally thought were blackheads but nothing happened when I squeezed them, so later I learned that they were sebaceous filaments--often mistaken for blackheads. I started using this on my nose a couple of weeks ago and a little less than a week after I started using it the filaments on my nose started clearing up. There was a huge difference. I've been using it for about two weeks now and they're almost completely gone. Completely recommend!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cedes,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I was really excited for this product as I’ve seen so many good reviews on it. I’ve recently also seen reviews on how the packaging is different that as pictured for some who have ordered. This was the case for me as well. My bottle arrived in a white bottle instead of the dark bottle pictured and advertised. This did nothing for my skin at all. I don’t have really bad skin but I do have a few dark spots and pores that can be noticeable sometimes. I get oily in my T-Zone so I was definitely looking forward to this product. Im not sure if I was sent a different formula since it was different packaging but I am not happy with this purchase. Glad I got the travel size.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’m gonna give it 3 stars.,"Pros: It does a good job at lightening blemished skin, after a few uses my skin was brighter and looked more healthy. The size is also convenient if you just want to try out!","Cons: After it did its job at brightening my skin, it only began to break me out and dry out my skin, so if you have really sensitive skin I think it’s best to use it once or twice a week.\n",,,,,,,,,
Julia K,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is a bestseller not without a reason. First of all, the product I received is authentic. ( I religiously keep buying it ever since I found out about it). It is great for fighting small inflammations and acne. If you have some developing acne, they would definitely shrink in size. I used azelaic acid from TO, some other TO bestsellers, a few acid products from Bliss, Kiehl’s- none achieved what this BHA has. Love it, recommend trying the travel size first to check for reaction. My skin is dry-ish, very sensitive, with rosacea.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
KWill,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Only tried this product once and it left such a gross, sticky feeling on my face. Even my finger tips were sticky from holding the cotton ball that had the product on it. The only way I was able to get rid of that feeling was to wash my face twice. I can't send this back far enough. One of the worst skincare products I've ever used.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Maddy Odine,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I suffer from not only painful cystic acne but also closed comedonal acne as well. It seems my skin is just not made to correctly handle dirt, debris, and the day to day sloughing of skin and sebum. So far I had already found a way to handle my cystic acne; I started on a routine of Vitamin A, B5, and Zinc. So all that was left was to deal with the pesky under the skin acne. I knew salicylic acid was the number one treatment for closed comedones so I started doing a little research. Initially I started with using the 2% pads from the drugstore, not realizing that they contain fragrance. Came to Amazon to see what I could find and gave this a shot. This was exactly what my skin needed, no muss, no fuss, just a basic chemical exfoliator. I started off using it once a day at night (please avoid going out into the sun with this product on) but it started to dry my skin out. I’m now on my third week and I’ve discovered my sweet spot is twice a week or every 3-4 days. I’ll apply it before bed with a cotton pad, wait 20 minutes or so, then apply my moisturizer. My skin has drastically improved in appearance and texture.","I wouldn’t call this a miracle drug by any means, I don’t think I will magically clear up your acne in one night. If you know that your skin isn’t processing oils/dirt correctly and you need a chemical exfoliator; this is it. Salicylic acid is a compound that helps your skin exfoliate and prevent pores from plugging up. It’s literally changing how your skin processes things. I did break out initially which is to be expected since I had so many underlying comedones. I wouldn’t recommend putting this on your skin unless you can firmly say your skin needs a Salicylic acid treatment.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Kayla,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was skeptical at first to use this product, I had only heard about it on a blog and saw the bloggers before and after pics and decided to give it a try. I bought the small travel size bottle just in case it didn't work so I wouldn't be out too much $$ on a product that didn't even work. I have really sensitive skin and recently started breaking out like a hormonal teenager at the age of 24, YIKES! The thing that gave me hope was I saw the blogger had the exact same acne as I did (oily skin and small hormonal bumps all other my face) I was really nervous to try it but I was getting desperate! Needless to say I AM SOOOOOOO GLAD I TRIED IT! I put it on at night and the next morning those little bumps drastically went away! now I use it every night ( I have had the travel size bottle for 1 month and I still have half a bottle, you only need two drops a night and I rub in my clean hands and pat all over my skin) I wish I had a before and after pic, because those honestly speak louder than words but I was so self conscious i didn't want to take pics. ANYWAY you should definitely at least give this product a try  I have now implemented it in my regular face regimen and I don't plan on looking back!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Kindle and Tech Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I used this product in tandem with the Simple Water Boost Micellar Facial Gel Wash and CeraVe Face Moisturizer with SPF 30, and what everyone else says about this product reacting poorly to the sun is very true. Use it strictly at night in the 30 minutes before you go to bed, and you'll be fine. If you want to use this product any time during the day, YOU HAVE TO FOLLOW UP WITH SUNSCREEN!","That being said, this product is excellent. I saw drastic improvements in my skin on both my face and arms in just two weeks, and I've had pizza face ever since I hit puberty.","Dry skins beware: this product has a nasty tendency to suck out all the moisture in your skin. Even my incredibly oily face feels dryness if I use too much. Just a few dabs is good enough for your entire face, and the 1oz bottle has lasted me well over a month and a half.","The bottle says to use this product daily, but it's a pretty potent product, so I recommend using it every other day instead.\n",,,,,,,,
Collin,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’m using this every other day along with Paula’s facial cleanser .1% (.01%?) and the slight acne is drying up without drying my face.  I don’t even need a moisturizer with it!  It’s so nice on delicate skin that I might try using it every day.  I’ll see how it goes this way for awhile first.  I Recommend the pair.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Evanne Gutierrez,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I struggle with PCOS-related acne, especially small bumps on my forehead. Even when I didn’t have a giant zit, the texture of my skin was horrible and covered in the small bumps that wouldn’t come to a head. I’ve been using this serum for about 2 months now and have noticed a significant reduction in the amount of bumps! Like, I have 1/5 the number. It’s improving some of my discoloration from the scars of bumps as well. I can’t wait to see what continued use brings. I would highly recommend this.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Courtney K.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have been on the search for something that would help the little bumps on my skin for YEARS. I have the most sensitive skin ever!! Been trying different products for years and always would break out from it. I was hesitate to try this product because i figured it would just cause my face to breakout again. I thought well it’s only $10 so worth a shot!! I put it on before bed and woke up with my skin glowing so i thought okay i’ll try and use it every night well after the second day in a row using it my face started to peel bad and got super dry. I read reviews and people suggested to use it once a week or every other day. I tried 2x a week and that seems to work! plus makes the product last longer!! I have been using it for 3 weeks now 2x a week and seriously have noticed a huge difference in my skin! the little bumps on my forehead are disappearing this stuff is the real deal!!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This stuff is incredible. I bought it a while ago and wasn’t using it correctly so I didn’t see a difference but after having it recommended to me so many times I had to try it again. I use it once a day, after cleansing my face and applying moisturizer at night. In the moment it makes your skin feel gross, I know. But if you use it religiously, it gets better. All of my nose pores are gone, my skin is so soft and smooth, my milia are clearing up, and my face hasn’t broken out since using it! Don’t apply it on a cotton pad though, just put some drops directly on your face and rub them in. Otherwise you waste a ton. Highly recommend!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Nicole Steiner,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Works great, really evened my skin tone and helped my cystic adult acne. It didn’t dry my skin out either\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Ginger ,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have only had this for a week and it has been great so far! I have already noticed some of my pores getting smaller and overall my face feels so much softer. It did bring a couple of breakouts to the surface after the first use, but after reading some reviews it seems like this is pretty normal. Overall, I’m very happy with this product and am definitely going to buy the larger size when this one is gone.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Caitlin,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This is honestly a miracle worker. All of a sudden starting last summer I started to have bumbs under the surface of my skin on my forehead and due to going to the gym I started getting acne on my face and chest. Since I started using this the bumps are almost completely gone and when I have acne I will just put this on and it’s gone in a couple days. 10/10 would recommend. I also do have sensitive skin and it can be drying but that’s to be expected\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Mel,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I definitely suggest getting the travel size bottle to test. When i first bought the travel size and used it my skin began to “crust” on my forehead and get really dry. Because i was introducing my skin to a product it had never dealt with my skin reacted in a negative fashion, my skin isn’t sensitive and can take quite a beating so i continued using it. My skin eventually got used to it within 3-4 weeks and the peeling and crusting went away. I was left with a brighter complexion, smoother skin, and i simply saw an improvement in my skin. it’s quite expensive for the amount of product but if you afford it i recommend it. Try the smaller bottle first to see how your skin reacts before committing to the larger bottle.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This stuff has truly changed my skin for the good. I've suffered with moderate to sometimes severe adult acne since the age of 19 (I'm now 32) and this stuff is the only thing that has completely cleared my skin, ever. I pour a small amount in my hand and basically wipe it on after washing and toning my face then i follow that with moisturizing with emu oil or some facial oil. I stopped putting it on a cotton swab because i wasn't getting enough on my skin like that and it was running out much quicker.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
LaSheena Taylor,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I got this product to help with the overall appearance of wrinkles on my face and to fade discoloration. Not only did it do that within 2 months of consistent use (once or twice per week for my sensitive skin), but it has stopped 2 of my cystic breakouts dead in their tracks. I have hormonal cystic acne and they can be stubborn. As soon as I saw the areas getting red and sore deep down, I applied this solution... and BOOM... the next day... GONE. The first time I thought I was lucky, but I tried it again last night, and the same thing happened. No waiting 2 weeks for the cyst to go down. Gone overnight. I'll update here in another month with further progress.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
liz,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have sensitive combination skin and this product worked really well for me. I decided to buy it because I have millia on my chin, little white bumps caused by dead skin clogging my pores. I was nervous to try a chemical exfoliant because my skin in really sensitive and dry in some places. This product helped my oily t-zone and my dry patches. There was a week or so where my skin was purging and I had a few pimples and my blackheads were brought to the surface but this means its working - however I don't recommend starting starting use right before a big event. Now after about four weeks my skin is pretty clear and I see a SUBSTANTIAL decrease in blackheads and whiteheads. This is the first product that has ever worked for my blackheads.",I use it in my more oily t-zone every night and all over my face every other night. The travel size has more than enough product in it to test if this product works for your skin before committing to a full bottle.\n,,,,,,,,,,
michaelg,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This is super-runny, and very hard to apply (cotton pads are a must).  It seems to have little to no effect initially, but after the third use, I was extremely dried out.  The bottle says ""use once or twice daily"".  I'd suggest once or twice weekly.  Maybe okay if used in conjunction with some very strong moisturizers to keep up with the drying effect which this has.  However, it did reduce my pore size quite a bit, and my skin was noticeably more even and smooth.  Probably won't buy this again.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Shanley,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Didnt seem to do anything except break me out and left an unpleasant film on my skin. The film is supposed to stay, but I don't like that its sticky.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Sophia Ross,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  MUST BUY. All I can say is wow. I have always had pretty bad cystic acne and well, really every other type of acne. It sucks! Nothing really worked the way this stuff does. I got a compliment the other day that my skin was “glowing” I AGREE!! This stuff really works. I have sensitive, but oily and sometimes dry skin. So you could say I have a complicated complexion? Overall, I highly recommend anyone looking for a fixer upper, to get this. Love it!! Also, I only have one blemish right now... and I always breakout when I am Menstruating so that tells ya!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Pamelaj,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I was hopeful that this would help my dry facial skin but all I have is another bottle to add to my collection of poor products. It does make the skin feel soft while wearing but other than that I have no good results.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
D. Flink,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I bought the travel size to make sure it didn’t mess up my skin before committing to the full size. This has done great things for my skin. It’s helped to shrink my pores, resurface my skin and help in cell turnover. It does dry my skin out a tad, but it’s worth it for the results.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Julie,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Great product love it, just wish the bigger bottles weren't so pricey! My skin has been much healther looking, my pores are deffenitly getting better! I actually wish i herd about this stuff years ago! Ive suffered with big pores & acne scars for way to many years! I cant wait to see long term results with this! I have very sensitive skin & this stuff is amazingly gentle! 😁\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Bahar Basaga,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This stuff is super sticky...It's not supposed to be rinsed off but the sheer feeling of it is enough to say ""I'll deal with the keratosis pilaris, just get this off me.""\n",,,,,,,,,,,
DJ,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Wow..so first of all I guess I should have looked at how much I was getting for my money...this is a very small bottle and pricey!  Not sure what all the hype is about but for my somewhat mature skin it did nothing. Absolutely nothing. My skin looks no different after using this than before.  Certainly not worth the money.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Devona,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This made my skin really soft when I used it everyday. A little bit goes a long way. After about 2 weeks of use, my skin became very oily and my face broke out. I had to stop using it in order to control the oil it was building up on my skin. I have sensitive dry skin, oily has never been my issue.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
shay,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was an avid St Ives exfoliator user for over a decade and was skeptical about chemical exfoliators. So I got the small bottle to give it a try. Never going back after switching to this! Put this on at night, all redness/irritation/breakouts gone by morning. I will purchase the full size after I run out.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
michael pena,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  i like this product, if your suffering from nose white & black heads this product is a miracle!!! i used to use biore nose strips now i dont need to cuz my black heads cleared up thanks to this bha. and i use it 3X a week only on nights m/w/f that works for me ! this is a must on your skin care routine and the days when im not using this i use applecider vinegar as a toner !! and ohh make sure to use a  moisturizer after applying this! i wait for 20min and let the bha soak in my skin then i apply my moisturizer!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Sammy Lou,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Be very  careful you will burn yourself if you don’t use very little, I wouldn’t recommend for sensitive skin like mine it made it way more sensitive even though I was only using it at night and using sunscreen during the day it did resurface some but honestly it’s not worth the sensitivity All the time\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Chelsea L.,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Many people love this stuff and it is a great product but there are a few cons some people may not like! Yes, it works and it doesnt burn or sting in anyway. It is pretty greasy feeling and never felt like it sank into my skin. If you have the same issue I suggest trying the BHA gel by PC, i switched to it and LOVE this in the gel form!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Lisa,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Love, LOVE this product! I don't think I could live past three days without using this liquid gold on my neck and face! If you're interested in having flawless and beautiful skin, Paula's choice skin perfecting will never disappoint!❤️\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jessica,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  LOVE LOVE LOVE this product. It works perfectly for my skin. I have congestion built up on my chin and jawline creating a lot of unwanted texture. This product works wonders on clearing this issue up. It minimizes my pores, evens my skin tone and gives my skin a fresh, clean complexion. I tend to use twice daily and I have no issues with dryness. I do use a heavy moisturizer (partially because I live in Arizona) due to combination skin. I can’t recommend this product enough.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
George,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I really like this product because it is a BHA and it smells nice while not being too harsh so it can be applied daily. I have been using this product mostly for my severe case of acne along jojoba oil and have seen some good improvements. Would highly recommend anyone to give this product a try.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Happygothic,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I noticed a difference after the first night I used it bc when I woke up the next day. My face looked brighter in comparison to when I use a face mask with instant results. I will be buying the full size bottle when I run out\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jen Morasca,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  It tingles when you put it, feels really refreshing and you can tell its going to work on your imperfections. I woke up the next morning with significantly clearer skin.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Sarah,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I love this product! It has been a staple in my skin care regimen for almost a year now. I love that Amazon carries the trial size bottle as I travel quite a bit for work. Note: This product is not for people with sensitive skin and who have never used any type of acid before. You have to work your way up to this product. But once you do it is SO worth it!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Alyssa,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have very oily skin.  This stuff seemed to make the oil production go into overdrive. I was advised to stick with it for one more bottle, but I couldn’t take it anymore - I was even getting blackheads. I believe it works for some,  just not for me.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
arturo falla,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This product is actually all it’s hyped up to be! DEFINITELY helped clear up my acne, especially blackheads. I only use 3x/week in an effort to not over exfoliate. One of the few products where you see instant/next day results!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
NYC0516,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I like this product, I like other people have noticed a difference in my pores and so has my husband. It is easy to apply and a little goes along way. Everyone's skin is different and you should do your research on bha/aha chemical exfoliants prior. Also patch test!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Kotdaji Ha,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I bought this product after reading lots of reviews. My current skin is dealing with on-going breakouts..,I applied this product on my skin and guess what. It burned! It turned my facial skin...The breakout was worse...,I should've tested on my arm before using this straight to my face.,I am not saying that this product is bad. I am sure this is very helpful to some people. but trust me. Test first! and then face! I know this burn and skin irritation will go away soon but it is painful to go through this.\n,,,,,,,,
Susie Plemons,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I. Love. This. When my skin is being a jerk at the end of a long week I use this and it’s like it sluffs off all the dead skin cells and it makes my skin feel so fresh and new.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Paige Thibert,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I love this product! It transformed my skin. I have oily skin and have always struggled with acne. This made my skin no longer oily and reduced my breakouts to almost nothing! I use it once a day every morning. It cleans the skin so well. Definitely recommend using a moisturizer after.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
ao,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have really dry skin so I was nervous to try an acid. But I was looking for something to compliment my retinol treatment for smoothing rough patches and milia. My skin is so soft after using this. And it's not irritating or over-drying at all. Definitely will repurchase. New holy grail!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cherry T.,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It made my skin even more greasy and I already deal with oiliness. It also came in this tiny little travel size container. I guess I should have paid more attention.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sara Small,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I got this to loosen up some sebaceous filaments and it works well for that. It is very drying so I’m having to back off of using it nightly. I wouldn’t say this is good for sensitive skin.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jenna S.,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  noticed almost immediate results. have had much fewer breakouts since using, my acne is almost completely gone. skin feels smoother and looks more even-toned. havent seen a huge decrease in my clogged/large pores which was one major reason I purchased, but regardless, it has become a staple in my beauty routine!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Marissa Yamauchi,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I really wanted to love this product, but I couldn't because it was harsh on my sensitive skin and made it burn and left an uncomfortable residue on my face. It just didn't work for me. If you have sensitive skin or dry skin, then you might not love this product for your skin. I did notice a difference in my complexion, but it was just too harsh for my own preference. I bought the little trial bottle to see if I would love it, but I will not be buying another bottle.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Addicted. It helps clear up my face when I use it and my skin looks plump and glows in the morning but it shouldn’t be used every night so the ones I need to take a break are sad. But totally worth the money just be careful if you have sensitive skin as you would with any exfoliant\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cat ,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I just recently bought this product, I only got the travel size because I wasn’t sure if it would actually work. After the first night I saw immediate improvements with my skin and my subclinical acne! It’s not completely gone but I’m sure if I continue to use it it will really help! My pores feel extremely clean also. But just a warning, that if you use it everyday your skin will dry out! Obviously this is the case with any acne solutions. Every skin is different but keep using it and maybe it’ll work for you too!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jordyn,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I've struggled with whiteheads for years, and it seems I've finally found the product to fix the problem. I stopped going to the dermatologist after a multitude of allergic reactions from prescription medication and I started to believe that nothing would be able to fix my whiteheads. After a little over a month of use, I've noticed a dramatic improvement in my acne and skin texture. This product is truly a miracle-worker.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
tehilla v.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I've always had blackheads on my nose. I got this product 3 days ago, and have just started using it the last 2 days--but I already see results.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Ashley,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Saw this on YouTube and it’s really helped with not only my acne but my scarring as well! I bought the 1 oz to try and can’t wait for my bigger bottle to come. So amazing!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
jessica,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I don't get how a small, 10 dollar bottle could've made such a difference. The best part is that you can use it everyday rather than 2-3 times a week so you can just easily work this into your daily skin carte regime! It's easier and better than any scrub exfoliator I've tried before, and works better too.","If you're pale, make sure to use sun screen/foundation before going outside! But that is a small price to pay for a product this amazing.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Joyce ,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I mean..it’s not a holy grail product and it didn’t fix my skin even though I tried it for a few months. It also didn’t make my skin any worse..I’m kind of indifferent about it.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Melyssa C.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Wow i actually do think my face looks better. More even and my pores seem smaller. Will definitely buy again like the rest of everyone else here.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
lwz,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Paula' Choice has changed package for over a year, but I still got the BHA (Most popular Paula's choice item) with the old look! And the bottle is leaked! I do not want to risk my skin so have to return the greasy out of date bottle ...\n",,,,,,,,,,,
CK,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This works as it is described to- however, beware if you have sensitive skin!! I used a clay mask and attempted to extract blackheads prior to applying this and the combination resulted in a similar reaction as sun poisoning- will continue to use, just not in conjunction with other exfoliation techniques!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Life changing!!! Leaves your skin plump, hydrated and moisturized. Leaves your skin ready for makeup, you won’t even need a primer. This single product has made a huge difference in my skin. I’m 36.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
rabbit rabbit,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This feels like witch hazel mixed with hydrogen peroxide.,It leaves a greasy feel that dissipates after about 15 minutes.,Not worth the price.\n,,,,,,,,,
Kristen Anderson,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was very excited about this, as Paula's Choice comes very recommended, and this also has green tea in it.","It was just okay, in my book. Nothing spectacular. Definitely not worth the price.\n",,,,,,,,,,
DocHDL,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent liquid exfoliant. It keeps my skin smooth. It can cause irritation so be careful around broken skin! The price is fair and the bottlecap prevents accidental leaks or spills.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
L3,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I love all of Paula's Choice items, this has to be one of my favorite. Great on my sensitive skin\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Burrow,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Took the dead skin off my face and I can tell the difference and so can other's.it works as described.thanks!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Karie,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I was a bit skeptic at first as it comes in a small bottle with but after 3 days of using it twice a day, my skin became very smooth and my pimple scars disappeared. I just bought another one. Love this product\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Heather Williams,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I've been using this for 3 days now and my skin feels smoother already. I always have clogged pores and blackheads and nothing works for me so I decided to give this a try and it's working well so far.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
John Olivan,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I liked this product. It didn't make my skin drastically better. But I did see some small improvement with my skin texture.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
j s,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  One of the best if not the best products for acne and oily skin .\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Samar Naik,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Without moisturizing it will not give great result for oily skin. You should apply moisturizing cream with it\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Yolanda Graves,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Using too much will give you breakouts and extremely soft sensitive irritated skin.,"Once a day, n my face looks so much brighter, smoother and dewy\n",,,,,,,,,,
Jose De La Cruz,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I find that if you just leave it on your forehead pimps it does not really do much. You have to first pop them and then apply this to your forehead. Be carful not to fake your skin though. I could not find an alternative method. I do not have the brand’s face wash so I will give that a try soon.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Pinkerellie P.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I struggle with acne way too god damn much and putting this on overnight and waking up the next day makes my skin smoother and prevents new pimples. I put 4 drops on a cotton square and use on my face, chest, and back. A little drying, so remember to wear lotion afterwards.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Andrea,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Traded in clogged pores for the driest, flakiest skin ever. What’s worse...\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amber,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Worked good but dried out skin. Cut down from daily use to every other day. Small white acne bumps on my forehead didn’t go away. Reduced a little bit but didn’t cure the acne.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Maezer Beam,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I really enjoyed  this on my combination skin.  I live in Chicago and the winter is brutal, follow this up after toner with a serum to moisturize and watch those pores shrink!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Raelyn,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Skin perfection! I use it every day before applying my moisturizer. I have combination/oily skin and prone to breakouts along my chin area. This stuff has cured all of that and has definitely put any future breakouts at bay. LOVE this stuff and I absolutely recommend it to anyone!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Pugs and Kittens,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This works really well. I have cystic acne and sensitive skin. This made me glow\n,,,,,,,,,,,
JTM,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Why didn’t I buy this sooner?! Keeps my skin clear and my sebaceous filaments at bay. Gentle yet effective.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
dncngrny,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  don't know yet -- have not used it much\n,,,,,,,,,,,
crash Dallolio,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Works quite well.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
ashley,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have suffered from rosacea for several years and most creams, serums, or drops either irritated my skin or dried it out. I have used this liquid exfoliator every other day for a week and already my skin is less red and more smooth! I would definitely recommend! I bought the travel size and will be buying the full bottle next time!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
yajaira,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Fake.,Didn’t even to bother opening it.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I started using this at night and my skin has improved! The texture on my skin is starting to look better and my pores look smaller! It’s pricey for a small bottle but the bottle goes a long way.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
dayna,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I really like this stuff\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Like others said: smells like nail polish remover.  I used it every other night for about a week. I have sensitive skin so this really did a number on my face. If you have rosacea find something else. Ended up throwing the bottle away.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Thorne,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  My pores appear smaller and all the tiny closed comedones that lived on my chin completely disappeard within 2 weeks.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Shana,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  So it's great for sensitive skin I have sensitive skin, it did moisturize it never left ny skin feeling dry, there was no scent which is also a plus. BUT I didnt like it I feel like it didnt help my acne. There was no change my acne stayed the same😑\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Brianna Jenkins,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Didn't do a thing for me.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Cate,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I guess its ok but this product smells aweful.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Megan M.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Helps when I have break outs -- just dab some on and let it sit overnight, My skin has improved significantly since using this.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Simon Arango,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I love this product l. I use it at night, and when I wake up my skin looks so much better. When my skin is feeling dull and dry, this is my first choice. I alternate using this with my retinol for acne about three times a week, and so far so good.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Katie Hernandez,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Love it. LOVE IT. Makes my skin feel so fresh and so healthy... just wonderful\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Maria,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ordered for blackhead reduction on my nose. Bottom line, I WILL be re-ordering in bulk. Saw a major improvement in just a few uses. Visibly shrunk pore size and with continued use along with exfoliating should be free of blackheads. Love this product.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Phong L.,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Nice does not irritate skin,\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Savoy Morgan,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  work well get dead skin cells off great\n,,,,,,,,,,,
NYreview,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Works well for oily skin\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Good product\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Justine C,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I’m always worried about trying new products to battle acne but I am so glad I took the risk when I made this purchase. I’ll need to buy the full size so I can continue to add this to my daily routine!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Lynda Williams,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  When I wash my face I never realized how dirty my face still was until I used this stuff. I love it\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Laila Abdelhafeez,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have been suffering from large pores on my cheeks for a quite a bit, this is amazing!!! I had significant results from the first usage!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Rachel,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I really like how my skin looks and feels like after using this product\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Alexa willhoit,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This stuff is amazing if you have texture and acne. I use it every other night and notice such a difference! Love it so much\n,,,,,,,,,,,
H aro Heich,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I received a fake product. I want my money back.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Danielle Walton,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Fast results, amazing product! Truly sold on the brand and amazed by how quickly the results show. Newer to the chemical exfoliant game and was not disappointed with this product!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great for acne. Love it.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Jayajothy,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  it actually reduced black heads on my nose noticeably on my first use. I don't know how much it works on reducing pores but I definitely noticed great and gentle exfoliation.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Miguel,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  One of the best products I've ever had, doesn't irritate my skin at all\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Clare Waterstradt,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Do not buy this product. My skin was overall smooth and then I started using this product - been for almost 2 weeks and I have terrible white heads all over my forehead and chin. Will not be using anymore!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
dea,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  recommended 👍👍👍\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Julie,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I tried this out and it did not help my pimples at all. I have congested skin oily and it didn’t do anything I still have my lil bumps and I gave  time to try it out.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Great product!! It goes deep into the pores and chemically exfoliates them very well, without drying my skin out. I use it every other night as a part of my nighttime routine.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Lisajean,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Great product! Tightens pores, moisturizer, dark spots fading, minimizes fine lines\n",,,,,,,,,,,
NanaLin,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product didn’t work well on my combination skin. I kept breaking out all over my face.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
ninjin bold,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  i really liked it,i’m gonna buy other product\n,,,,,,,,,,
bilen,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Excellent product. I see my blackheads disappearing overtime.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
nino bezhanishvili,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  highly recommend\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Savannah,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Amazing\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Haydn Lauck,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I love how my face feels after using this toner. Feels soft and moist and clean\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Alisha Usmani,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This helps clear up skin and lighten dark spots. My overall texture was also improved after only a week use.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Vee Lee,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  removes excess dirt, great product\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Derek C.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  One of the best products I've used for shrinking oversized whiteheads or lumpy acne.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
walaa,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Strong and gentle\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Susan Zelt,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have tried many skin care products. This does deliver as promised. I will repurchase.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Brooke Maciejewski,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great product really helped my skin clear up\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Pamela Peyton,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Gives skin glow\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sharol Wilson,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I like the product because it was what I expected.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ari B.,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  It’s super small (10OZ) . I might need to return it honestly\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Tresean,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  How can a product work this good?\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Nichole Poland,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Was pretty much just water.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ava,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Effective on the next morning!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Kyle & Donna Farquhar,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Works well for sebaceous hyperplasia. Great Price!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Paule,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product really saved my skin and I've only been using it for about a month!!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Emy L.,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I don’t see any difference.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Dugan P. Gascoyne,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Wow already seeing results!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
sukhleenkhanda,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  no good\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Sweeticecream,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Great  product but its pricey.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Holy grail exfoliant!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Joyce,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product did absolutely nothing for me.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Lahari Sangitha,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I used this once at night and it dried out my skin completely for several days! Would not recommend.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Helped reduce my acne and very moisturizing.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ashlee Frazier,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Within 10 minutes of applying I had to wash it off because my face was itching and turning bright red.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
ana,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Took off forehead bumps completely\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Alex,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I like it\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Denisa,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  A smooth peeling\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Madhuree,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  👌\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Leslie,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  i absolutely love this product!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Nice product.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Vicky,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Butterstück als Vergleich. 14€ für die Größe ist eine Frechheit. Wenn meine Haut nach der Anwendung nicht glatt und rein wie ein frischer Babypopo ist, bin ich schwer enttäuscht.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Giuseppe Giacomo Anselmo,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Prodotto che è bene utilizzare la sera prima di andare a letto, perché fotosensibile e non adatto alla luce solare.","Sin dalla prima applicazione vedrete che, passata un'ora, la pelle sarà più compatta e meno porosa; essendo un prodotto che secca parzialmente la pelle, i punti neri sono sotto stress e vengono via da soli, mentre i pori si chiudono e le discromie del viso si attenuano per un effetto che dura buona parte della giornata successiva.",Attenzione che nonostante le istruzioni invito ad utilizzarlo al massimo una volta ogni due giorni per evitare complicazioni nel lungo termine.\n,,,,,,,,,
Tolley-Schauer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich habe das Mittel am 18.02.20 bestellt, da ich plötzlich mit meinen 29Jahren wieder aussah wie in der Pubertät. Pickel uns Mitesser zierten meine Stirn. Ich hätte nach 6Monatiger Wartezeit im März einen Termin beim Hautarzt gehabt, welcher aufgrund der Corona Situation leid abgesagt wurde.","Allerdings sind meine Pickel nun so gut wie nicht mehr vorhanden, also werde ich vorerst auch keinen neuen Termin (wann auch immer dieser Stattfinden würde) machen.",Paula's Coice hat mir echt geholfen.,Ich war überrascht wie klein die Flasche ist. Etwa wie ein Pröbchen oder Reisefläschchen.,"Allerdings hat es bis zum 30.04.20 gehalten. Also knapp 2,5 Monate.","Ich habe es anfangs 3 mal täglich angewendet, dann auf 2x reduziert.","Seit ein paar Tage ist es leer und ich nehme gerade gar nichts mehr, weil ich keine Pickel (bis auf einen) mehr habe.","Ich muss dazu sagen,  dass es wohl nur so lange gehalten hat, weil ich es NICHT auf einen Wattepad aufgetragen habe. Da wäre die Flasche wohl schon  nach 1 Woche leer gewesen.","Ich habe mein Gesicht gereinigt , meine Hände desinfiziert und das Paulas Choice direkt mit den Fingern aufgetragen. So konnte ich es gut einmassieren und habe nur einen Bruchteil an dem Mittel verbraucht, was ich normal mit einem Wattepad gebraucht hätte.","Ich fand das  Mittel echt  gut, mir persönlich  hat es geholfen und ich würde es auch- trotz des hohen Preises - sehr empfehlen.\n",,
VR,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich liebe BHA und Aha... Für mich die effektivsten Peelings überhaupt. Dieses mL habe ich mich für PC entschieden und ich finde es super. Es mildert Unreinheiten ziemlich schnell, man bekommt mit der Zeit einen schönen Glow und es verkleinert sichtbar die Poren. Ich verwende es 3-4x pro Woche. Meine Haut ist allerdings einiges gewöhnt, und somit habe ich kein Problemdamit es so oft an zu wenden. Wenn man anfängt diese Peelings zu verwenden, sollte man mit 1x pro Woche beginnen und es wirklich langsam steigern.  Für mich sind BHA, AHA, Niacinamid und  Co meine bevorzugten Hautpflege Produkte. Der Preis ist für mich noch absolut ok, da gibt es teurere Produkte die weniger Wirkung haben. Dieses ist nunmal kein Drogerieprodukte. Es kommt auf die Inhaltsstoffe an und auf nichts anderes. Drogerieprodukte erreichen auch niemals die gewünschte Wirkung, da die Inhaltsstoffe einfach zu gering von der Wirkung her sind. Ich kann dieses Produkt empfehlen👌\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Pina,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  vorab, es freut mich, dass es bei so vielen geholfen hat. für mich war es bedauerlicherweise mal wieder nur rausgeschmissenes Geld. ich bin froh, dass ich die (wirklich) kleine Flasche für 14 € gekauft habe. morgens und abends benutzt 0 Wirkung, außer, dass meine Haut total ausgetrocknet ist. keine Besserung der Mitesser, eventuell muss man das hier wirklich mit der pflegeserie komplett kombinieren, für mich allerdings bei dem Preis ein zu hohes Risiko.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
FiPe,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Meine Haut ist eventuell leicht besser geworden, es kamen keine neuen Pickel dazu. Große Poren bleiben unverändert.",Das Produkt ist sehr ergiebig. Auffallend lichtempfindlich ist meine Haut nach der Anwendung nicht. Aufgrund des hohen Preises würde ich das Produkt nicht nachkaufen.\n,,,,,,,,,,
AW,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  2 Tage benutzt, dann wurde die Haut plötzlich extrem trocken, die gesamte Gesichtshaut spannte.","Ablösung der Gesichtshaut nach etwa 4 tagen. Trockenheit nur mit Feuchtigkeitscreme auszuhalten, Rötungen und Juckreiz inklusive, keine Kaufempfehlung!","Wie so ziemlich jedes ""gegen Akne/unreine Gesichtshaut usw. Produkt"", nutzlos.\n",,,,,,,,,
McNuts,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich war auch erst enttäuscht über die Größe aber wie angegeben, 30ml sind halt nur 30ml und um die Wirkung zu testen, ist die Größe wunderbar! Ich persönlich bin vollkommen überzeugt von dem Produkt, es wirkt (bei mir)! Meine Haut ist nach der vierten Anwendung schon viel weicher, Rötungen und Unreinheiten verblassen langsam. Natürlich hängt es vom Hautbild ab, was und ob sich was tut und jede Haut ist anders. Ich kann daher nur für mich sprechen. Desweiteren hätte ich mich geärgert, wieder eine volle Tube/Ampulle im Regal verstauben zu lassen. Klare Kaufempfehlung von mir :)\n",,,,,,,,,,,
IuPa,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  The product is amazing. However I did not check the size of the product: it’s 30 ml (tiny tiny bottle - sample size) and it’s 37$.,On Paula’s choice website the same product at 118ml is 24$. Don’t be like me... don’t buy it on amazon!\n,,,,,,,,,,
Rica W.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Ich habe genetisch bedingt unreine Haut und momentan durch Stress ständig Pickel an der Stirn und um die Mundpartie. Das Peeling bewirkt keine Wunder, aber es macht, dass frisch entstandene Pickel nicht größer werden und nicht weh tun und nach kurzer Zeit wieder verschwinden. Das habe ich schon nach 2-3 Tagen Anwendung bemerkt. Ich bin sehr glücklich mit dem Produkt, auch für den Preis!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Kunde,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Das peeling wirkt recht schnell und behebt unreinheiten auch gut bzw. Beugt gut vor. Kann aber empfehlen auf der offiziellen homepage zu kaufen, da ists etwas günstiger. Hatte es hier nur zum ausprobieren besorgt um die versandkosten bei paulas choice zu sparen aber das erledigt sich wenn man die volle größe bestellt.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
PLB,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Das Produkt ist sehr gut, nach einer Woche Anwendung sieht meine Haut insgesamt deutlich besser aus (keine Rötungen mehr, kleine Fältchen reduziert, keine Pickel mehr) - allerdings hatte ich übersehen dass dies die „Probiergröße“ ist. Für den Preis inakzeptabel. Das Fläschchen ist so groß wie mein Daumen...\n",,,,,,,,,,,
julyn,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Sowohl mir und meiner Schwester waren die Pickel nach einem Tag weg oder mn ht definitiv eine starke Besserung gesehen. Ich dachte ich probiere es mal aus trotz einige negativen Bewertungen (auf die ich immer achte!). Ich werde es weiterhin bestellen.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Nat,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This is a scam.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
anonyme,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Franchement j'ai déjà recommandé un second produit pour ne pas en manquer quand j'aurai fini celui là .,J'en mets le soir avant de dormir et je me réveille avec une peau neuve. Ça agit sur rides et boutons c'est super.,Par contre en journée je n'en mets pas c'est photosensiblisant donc avec le soleil pas top.,Ça fait un peu tirailler la peau les premières fois ça me faisait même peler au niveau du nez mais ça va mieux maintenant et le résultat est là donc c'est ce qui compte.\n,,,,,,,,
Susanna Giovannnini,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Lo uso tutte le sere dopo la detersione. Lascia la pelle luminosa, secca i brufoli, esfolia con delicatezza.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Cliente Amazon,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Soy muy satisfecho con este producto\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Nic K.,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  War zunächst erstmal erschrocken über die Grösse der Flasche. Es ist wohl eine Reisegrösse aber auch sehr ergibieg.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
NaKai,2.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Super BHA-Produkt!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Emma Hermann,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Was soll ich sagen , Girls and Boys.. das Zeug ist der Wahnsinn ! Ihr werdet es nicht bereuen!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Aude L.,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Super produit, très efficace. Format ideal pr le voyage ou juste pour tester avant d'acheter.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
A.T,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Tolles Produkt. Habe es mit einigen Freundinnen ausprobiert, alle sind begeistert!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Chrissy,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Mein erstes chemische Peeling und bis jetzt bin ich super begeistert.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
jourdet,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  C'est un produit extraordinaire. Je ne m'en passe plus. Ma peau s'est beaucoup améliorée. Par contre à éviter l'été ou bien penser à mettre une protection solaire.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
kayra,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  sehr gut\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Residents,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Paula's choice è un brand ancora poco conosciuto in Italia, ma molto noto all'estero per i sui prodotti a base di acidi e per la formulazione di prodotti efficaci.","Generalmente si tratta di prodotti che fanno esfoliazione al viso, in questo caso in particolare è uno dei prodotti di punta del brand.","Il prodotto è un liquido trasparente, da passare sul viso con un batuffolo di cotone.","Si assorbe molto facilmente, rimuovendo delicatamente ma efficacemente le cellule di pelle morta riesce a dare  alla cute luminosità e morbidezza, combatte la formazione di brufoli e punti neri. Contiene acido salicilico, senza profumi, proprio perché contiene questo acido, non ci si può esporre al sole se non con protezioni solari molto forti (ma per l'inverno, direi che è perfetta).","E' pensato in particolare per le pelle miste e grasse per tenerle pulite a fondo, ma per la mia pelle si è rivelato un po' troppo aggressivo perché mi arrossava moltissimo la pelle.",Vegan e non testata sugli animali.\n,,,,,,
Brutto anatroccolo,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Confezione da 118 ml, il prezzo è notevole ma il prodotto li vale",E' un liquido trasparente che effettua una esfoliazione dei pori e riduce la comparsa di punti neri e brufoli quindi indicato per chi ha pelle mista o grassa,Usando questo prodotto che contiene BHA (acido salicilico)  è assolutamente necessario utilizzare durante il giorno una crema con fattore di protezione SPF 30,"Non contiene profumo e si assorbe abbastanza velocemente, va applicato con un dischetto di cotone una o due volte al giorno dopo aver deterso il viso e  non va risciacquato",Tende a seccare la pelle pertanto si deve usare una buona crema idratante\n,,,,,,,
Merche,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Se trata de un exfoliantes suave en formato líquido.,"Nos llega un envase con 118ml. entre sus ingredientes destacan el ácido salicílico,","El uso es sencillo: se echa el producto en un disco de algodón y se va pasando por todo el rostro. A ver no sé si es que echo poco producto o que se evapora pues al comienzo bien, pero enseguida me da la sensación de que el algodón está seco y no húmedo por lo que tengo que añadir más producto.","La cuestión es que limpiar limpia en profundidad, aunque reseca supongo que será por sus ingredientes exfoliantes por lo que se recomienda hidratar la piel con una crema que contenga un factor de protección solar ya no es que sea un recomendación hidratar después de usarlo es una necesidad porque al menos a mí me queda la piel supertirante y necesito hidratarla a conciencia.\n",,,,,,,,
★━━━━━★ S & J ★━━━━━★,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Très bon exfolient de la marque Paula’s Choice qui permet de réguler l'excès de sébum de ma peau mixte à tendance grasse.,"Je l'utilise une fois tous les deux jours et c’est largement suffisant, car c’est un produit qui décape bien la peau.",Il laisse la peau douce et nette.,Je recommande 😊\n,,,,,,,,
jijirita,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Ce soin permet d'exfolier sa peau en profondeur et d'éliminer les imperfections et réduit la production de boutons et de points noirs.,"A utiliser un jour sur deux en imbibant un coton puis de l'appliquer sur son visage tout en évitant le contour des yeux, surtout ne pas rincer.",A base de thé vert qui est un excellent anti-oxydant pour la peau et d'acide salicylique qui nettoie la peau en profondeur et a un effet anti-rides à la fois.,"Un soin que j'utilise depuis près de 3 semaines avec des résultats concluants pour moi, une peau plus nette, moi qui ai la peau mixte ma peau est nettoyée en profondeur et plus d'imperfection.\n",,,,,,,,
Yana,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have extremely sensitive and dry skin. I had large clogged pores and cystic acne and hormonal break out on my chin. I had no fear and used it everyday as directed for a week and a half now. Immediately,  I noticed unusual skin glow and brightness. My red spots started to disappear. My pores got smaller and most of all I saw them clean. It just pushed all the bad stuff out!!! I was shocked how fast it worked. But! After a few days I noticed my skin started to get tight even after I applied moisturizer. So I sometimes I skip one day and it helped a ton! I am so happy...girls I have been struggling all my life. I am 32yo. And now acne free!!!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Pumped,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  These are my results after 2 weeks. I've always suffered from acne, typically cystic acne on my chin. However, the breakout on my forehead did not respond to my typical topic prescription creams.  I noticed that my body wash, Neutrogena, contained Salicylic acid and kept my body clear so I decided to give this a try for my face. Within 2 week, the pimples began to fade. Full transparency, I paired this with Skin ID glycolic acid face wash. With daily use, the combo dried me out and there was peeling despite using Origins moisturizer regularly. I will continue to use Paula's Choice once a day in the evening and wash Skin ID until the pimples are completely gone and then cut back use to prevent excessive drying. Overall, happy with the product.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amy M,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Let me start off by giving the background as to why I ordered this product. I'm 37, have had 'acne' all my life, and having been an adult with bumps on my forehead and tried every possible product on the market, I've just about given up on it and thought to myself ""oh well, I guess this is how it's just going to be"". I've visited numerous dermatologists, I've tried topicals, I've tried Accutane (which as amazing as it is, wreaks havoc on the body), I've tried B5 pantothenic acid, clay masks, VI peel, Apple Cider Vinegar, cutting out alcohol, dairy, caffeine, sugar, ...I mean you name it, I've tried it. And with every single product, it improved slightly, or had no impact.","After tons of research, I learned about fungal acne. I think this is a VERY important piece of information, as I had no idea such a thing existed. I started digging more into it. As I read more, I started to think ""maybe the reason most these things don't work on my acne, is because I'm trying to treat bacterial acne and that's not at all what I'm dealing with"". So digging in further, I started reading about using Head & Shoulders Shampoo on my face. Yes. My face. HEAR ME OUT...the reason that the shampoo works well on acne is because it contains Zinc pyrithione. Slather H&S on your face, leave it on for 5 minutes and wash it off. Do this for a week and see if you see results, if you do...welcome to my world!","I also ordered the Paula's Choice Skin Perfecting Salicylic Acid and starting using this along with my H&S routine. Some of the reviews complain about this being sticky after application. Do this--- put it on after the shower, your face will absorb it much better and you won't be left with any sticky feeling. Also, be mindful of how much you apply. This isn't face painting, so don't drench yourself with it.","It's been almost 2 weeks since I've started this routine...no doctor...no dermatologist...no one could help me get to this point. Just a bunch of research and trial and error. Hopefully this'll help some others out there, as I found it hard to get advice on how much, what, and how often to do things. As always, you may need to shift and change your routine up to what works for you and your body.","My skin has been clear beyond anything I could have imagined or I've ever seen. The only other method that worked this well as Accutane, but that came with monthly testing, liver testing and joint pain like I've never felt before.","Google image your type of acne, then backtrack to articles and find what type of acne you have. If you have fungal acne, the standard acne medication out there won't do much for you.\n",,,,,,
Ciera,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Miracle potion!!! I have small under skin bumps on my forehead that are SO difficult to get rid of. I also have sensitive skin. I’ve only been using this product for 1 week and my forehead bumps are practically gone! I long for the perfectly smooth, blemish free, bump free skin I’ve seen other women with. I’m pretty confident this product will get me there. I’ve never been closer. I am in amazement!","I cleanse 2 times, apply a toner, and then apply this liquid exfoliator with a cotton pad. I then follow with a moisturizer. I only use this product once a day at night.",I was skeptical about using an exfoliator everyday giving I have sensitive skin but my skin is not irritated at all!,I also don’t have to use a cleansing brush(which tends to irritate my skin).,"I’ve also seen ppl say it was sticky. To me it’s not sticky but it does leave my skin veryyyy shiny. I don’t mind, though, because I only wear it at night to bed. I wouldn’t wear it in the day time because of the shine.\n",,,,,,,
Sarahanne1984,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  After a month of use I have noticed improvement in complexion. Dark marks scars and melasma seem lighter pores and sebaceous filaments seems smaller and less noticeable, less acne. However I am using it in combination with a new vitamin c hyalironic acid serum so I can’t say for sure which or both is doing the trick. Only adverse effects are that I believe this caused the skin on my nose to have some redness and peeling after a few weeks which was annoying and looked bad under makeup.  I thought maybe I was using it too often there since the skin on noses is thinner so I am skipping the nose for a while until it quits peeling. Over all I think I will continue to buy and use this product\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon Customer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have been dealing with stubborn milia (small bumps under eyes that won't go away) for several months and just after using this product for a week, they are going away!! Also my pores are smaller and I've been getting compliments on my skin. My skin is sensitive so I make sure to only a small amount on the stubborn spots at night and to apply toner first. (Salycilic acid should not be used during the day unless you put sunscreen on...it's best to use during night time)\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Indecisive shopper,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I tend to get congested during the summer, mostly around the t-zone, so I decided to try out this mini BHA formula that many people turn to as a holy grail. Definitely saw results to my skin after using this up so I will be purchasing a bigger bottle. For being a BHA product, this doesn't dry out the skin or irritate it. My skin probably doesn't need this for the winter season, but I could definitely see it being okay for a lot of people to use since it doesn't dry out the skin.","Has a faint chemical smell, but not at all overbearing. I like wiping this on with the cotton pad at night to really unclogged everything. I don't think it's necessary to use every day, 3 times a week does the trick. Make sure to use sunscreen\n",,,,,,,,,,
Ren Mercer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I found this product by Googling “how to get rid of bumps on forehead” and found a believable beauty blog that praised this. I was still skeptical, but I figured I would try the $10 trial bottle because the bumps bother me enough. I have fine hair and side bangs, so I always assumed I’d always have a gross forehead till...I died, I guess. The bottle is SMALL. Like the exact size of a glue stick. But, directions say to use cotton pads, dab some on, and cleanse affected area. First day was the “purge” some people are talking about. Irritated redness to the bumps. Day 2, the area around the bumps looks smoother and better. Bumps slightly less raised. Day 3, where I’m at, has very minimal bumps! Doesn’t feel like Braille on my head, anymore! Directions don’t say to wash off but I also wouldn’t go crazy dumping a lot on. (It’s an acidic exfoliating liquid that looks like water.) Try to do this on a weekend or day no one will see you so you can avoid makeup for the purging. Three days in, bottle still feels quite full for the size. This product is not meant to moisturize at all, so don’t expect it to.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
KatieBaker94,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I’ve been looking for a product to help get rid of small bumps on my forehead. There was a  discernible difference within a few days, and now that I’ve been on it for a few weeks my forehead is smooth. There was some purging which is usual for most skin products (for me at least) but it calmed down quickly. I’ve always been reluctant to use ANYTHING oily on my skin because I produce a lot of oil to begin with, but this has been a life changer. I’ve started using it on my whole face, again there’s been some purging. But for the first time in YEARS I had 2 days in a row zit free. I don’t even really moisturize my skin now because it is oil based. The only draw back I’ve come across is that it takes a while to be absorbed. So when I wear make up I have to allow time for it to sink in. Otherwise my skin just becomes an oily mess.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
ElizabethK,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I have not had a break out since starting using this and am so happy to have clear skin. In the past I have never gone more than 3 days without some sort of break out. I bought the 1 ounce size and use it twice a day. My skin feels soft and smooth. The only flaking I've experienced is on the former breakout sites that are still healing. The redness is receding but slowly. No change on my sun spots but Ive only been using for17 days. I expect the 1 oz bottle will last about 4 weeks but I already went ahead and bought the 4 oz bottle so I won't run out.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
SA Texas,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Update 10/06/2019- I've used product almost every night for a couple of months, It had some diminishing effects at first; however, my age spots are still there (could be they are just that stubborn, or just that severe). It did seem to help keep my nose pores from getting filled quickly with sebum ..or helped eat away at it.  No magic happening to lessen the size of the pores, but has helped in keeping them from filling so quickly.","A little less runny than water, so it somewhat stays in place. No redness or dry flaky skin from two weeks of nightly application; and one of my brown/age/""maturity"" spots does seem to be fading..  I will come back and edit my review after more use.\n",,,,,,,,,,
Raven D,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I love it and it does exactly what it's supposed to do - slough everything off. But it is NOT moisturizing you need to be excessively conscious of how drying it can be. Last night I tested out how much I could get away with, so I put only a very light layer of moisturizer overtop, and when I woke up this morning, every bump, blemish, and mark had shrunk considerably buuut also had a RING of dry skin around it. It's nice because it's doing its job but it's not very pretty LOL so in the future I'll go back to packing on the moisturizer - I use this as part of my regular skincare regimen, so I use an oil cleanser, water cleanser, toner, THEN this, and then put serums and moisturizer on top. I have very sensitive skin and this has works great for me. My face improved within the first few days - this stuff is honestly just awesome. I'm going to take a break for a couple of days to let all of that dry skin repair itself but I'm excited to keep using it!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
aruizOT,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I can’t believe how much this product has made a difference in my skin. My pores are significantly smaller and less clogged, and the overall texture of my skin is much smoother. I use once every other day, pouring directly from the bottle onto my face (rather than wasting product in a cotton round).  I am not consistent with morning VS night application - I just do it whenever I feel like my skin needs exfoliating. I think the timing will vary from person to person, but for me, this is optimal and giving me great results. No burning/stinging or other unpleasant side effects.  Highly recommend!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
S. Diggs,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Wow, it really does work. I have sensitive, oily skin, and I could tell a huge difference in the texture of my skin after one use. I put it on my face at night (using my fingers rather than a cotton pad to save product) and wash it off when I wake up in the morning. If you will be going outside, be sure to put on sunblock afterward. It does have an acidic feeling on your skin which I find uncomfortable, but since I put it on before bed I don't have to endure it long before I am asleep. I have been using it 2-3 times a week and my skin has stayed smooth and soft. I can especially tell the difference in blackhead-prone areas like my nose and chin. Highly recommend!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
James C Smith,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  After I shave and shower, I use Aveeno and this product, applied in that order, separately.  The Aveeno moisturizes without being greasy, while this product mixes in with the Aveeno to help heal my face from the nicks and abrasions from the twin blades.  By doing it this way, I use far less of this product to get the same results, because it mixes immediately with the still-wet Aveeno to spread evenly and thoroughly.",This usage works very well.\n,,,,,,,,,,
Cynthia,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I have sensitive skin and wanted to try a chemical exfoliator that wasn't too strong.  This is mild and after a month, my skin is in such good condition. It is smoother and has less blemishes. I have been plagued for years with skin issues and have used makeup to cover my flaws. My skin has cleared up so much that my boyfriend wants me to leave off the makeup so he can touch my face. That made me smile. My youngest daughter who inherited my skin issues has started using it recently and noticed that her skin is softer. I hope she will get the results I have.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Kristen,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I heard a lot of good things about this BHA product, but I had to return it after just a couple uses. The residue left behind is so oily/greasy feeling. I would definitely recommend Paula's Choice CLEAR Exfoliating Solution (Regular Strength) instead... same 2% strength but added soothing ingredients and no weird residue.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Danielle,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This is a very non abrasive exfoliator if that makes any sense! It’s just a liquid that you rub on your face after washing. Always use sunscreen if you use it in the daytime or you will have major regrets! I like using this every second or third day. Keeps my skin happy and smooth.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Anna Ashley,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  The other reviews complaining about it being sticky are true - but if you're using salicylic acid on your face you should really only be doing it 1 - 2 times a week during the evening so you can let it sink into your skin. Salicylic acid leaves your skin very vulnerable to sun damage, so you shouldn't really be using it during the day. After I use this stuff at night there is a noticeable difference to the brightness and smoothness of my skin, but I always take care to use a strong mineral SPF after!\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Amazon6015,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I love this stuff. I’ve been using it for over a year. It leaves my skin really smooth, minimizes pores, and eliminates flakey skin. Especially great for older skin.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
D. Pace,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  I wasn't sure this would do anything for my large pores, but surprisingly it does work and you only need a very small amount.  I will definitely purchase it again.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
jenny,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I picked this product originally because it’s cruelty free and it turned out to be awesome. I noticed the texture of my skin improved after just a few days and my pores looked way better. I’m hooked on the whole line now.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Aaron A chavez,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This product is truly amazing. Nothing has ever made my skin feel so soft! A little goes a long way work this product. Hitting 30 I've had really bad acne. Hormonal. Cystic. Just painful and this truly helps! Definitely worth a shot!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
jennifer,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  This formula is working very well for my sensitive, dry and hyperpigmentation skin. I use only at night and I see the difference in my skin. It’s smoother, with less pores and fading dark areas. Really gentle, without odors.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Megan,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Should have paid attention because this is a sample size product.  Not with the money even if it's effective.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
APEnchanted,5.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  My sensitive skin feels great, cleaner, visible reduction in unevenness, bumps. I use it AM and PM after cleansing and toning with Paul's Choice products. My skin cannot tolerate exfoliation scrubs so this product is perfect.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Maria,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Fantastic product for my acne prone 50 year old skin! It lifts and tightens and keeps the oilyness in control. I will order the big bottle as soon as this is done! Absolutely the best product in years!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Chief,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Works well, but a little too strong for my face so I diluted it. Also, too expensive for the amount one gets so I’m trying Clinique exfoliating lotion for men.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
celina,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Had it for 3 months nothing like the new black bottle I bought off their Paula choice site buy it off the site directly. This packing was old I either got a flop or an expired product.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Shaba L,1.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  A lot of people have got great results using this product, but unfortunately it didn’t work for me. It made my skin dry and irritated\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Sharon B.,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  The difference is definitely notable in the morning!! Tightened pores...smooth and lines less noticeable!!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Madison Scout,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I use curology for my acne and my dermatologist actually recommended this product.,I use it at night after washing my face and it does a great job of smoothing all the little bumps!\n,,,,,,,,,,
Hastarr,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  I LOVE this product. My skin feels so clean and soft after using it. It is definitely worth trying!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Chelsea Cochran,1.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Literally no improvements after using this a couple times a week.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Donna L. Hardy,4.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  As recommended by my skin doc, it does help shrink pores on face\n",,,,,,,,,,,
Jhil44,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This cleared up my acne really well! I love it!\n,,,,,,,,,,,
CrystalAnimals,3.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Didn’t see any improvement in my skin while using.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
kmd,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Does help to stop blemishes\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Ms. J,4.0 out of 5 stars,\n  This item was good to my skin. It is really helpful with my thigh acne.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Wolmar,3.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Too soon to find out if is effective, however the packaging needs work, the liquid is too thin, should have another type of dispenser.\n",,,,,,,,,,,
K's Mommy,5.0 out of 5 stars,\n  Love this stuff. Not over drying and keeps my skin nice.\n,,,,,,,,,,,
Michael Ballard,2.0 out of 5 stars,"\n  Loved this at first, but started to make my entire face peel. Worrisome so I put off using it for a bit\n",,,,,,,,,,,
